Missouri, session 2026, HB2626.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 21.810, 48.020, 50.610, 53.081, 53.250, 100.050, 137.010,
137.016, 137.021, 137.022, 137.073, 137.076, 137.079, 137.100, 137.115, 137.122, 137.160,
137.180, 137.235, 137.237, 137.243, 137.245, 137.295, 137.300, 137.335, 137.345, 137.355,
137.375, 137.405, 137.465, 137.480, 137.515, 137.720, 137.750, 137.930, 137.940, 137.985,
137.1003, 137.1018, 138.030, 138.060, 138.080, 138.110, 138.135, 138.180, 138.190,
138.200, 138.210, 138.235, 138.250, 138.290, 138.320, 138.330, 138.380, 138.390, 138.400,
138.420, 138.430, 138.433, 138.434, 138.435, 138.440, 138.445, 138.470, 138.480, 139.031,
150.080, 150.090, 150.290, 150.350, 150.360, 150.370, 151.020, 151.030, 151.040, 151.050,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2626 2
151.060, 151.070, 151.080, 151.090, 151.100, 151.110, 151.140, 151.150, 151.170, 151.320,
151.330, 151.340, 153.030, 153.040, 153.050, 155.020, 155.030, 155.040, 155.050, 160.254,
162.925, 164.011, 164.013, 178.880, 233.500, 321.554, and 536.085, RSMo, are repealed and
one hundred three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 21.810,
48.020, 50.610, 53.081, 53.250, 100.050, 137.010, 137.016, 137.021, 137.022, 137.073,
137.076, 137.079, 137.100, 137.115, 137.122, 137.160, 137.180, 137.235, 137.237, 137.243,
137.245, 137.295, 137.300, 137.335, 137.345, 137.355, 137.375, 137.405, 137.465, 137.480,
137.515, 137.720, 137.750, 137.930, 137.940, 137.985, 137.1003, 137.1018, 138.030,
138.060, 138.080, 138.110, 138.135, 138.180, 138.190, 138.200, 138.210, 138.235, 138.250,
138.290, 138.320, 138.330, 138.380, 138.390, 138.400, 138.420, 138.430, 138.433, 138.434,
138.435, 138.440, 138.445, 138.470, 138.480, 139.031, 150.080, 150.090, 150.290, 150.350,
150.360, 150.370, 151.020, 151.030, 151.040, 151.050, 151.060, 151.070, 151.080, 151.090,
151.100, 151.110, 151.140, 151.150, 151.170, 151.320, 151.330, 151.340, 153.030, 153.040,
153.050, 155.020, 155.030, 155.040, 155.050, 160.254, 162.925, 164.011, 164.013, 178.880,
233.500, 321.554, and 536.085, to read as follows:
21.810. 1. There is established a permanent joint committee of the general assembly
to be known as the "Joint Committee on Tax Policy" which shall be composed of five
members of the senate, appointed by the president pro tem of the senate, and five members of
the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. A
majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum. The members shall
annually select one of the members to be the chair and one of the members to be the vice
chair. The speaker of the house of representatives and the president pro tem of the senate
shall appoint the respective majority members. The minority leader of the house and the
minority leader of the senate shall appoint the respective minority members. The members
shall receive no additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary
expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties. No major party shall be
represented on the committee by more than three members from the senate nor by more than
three members from the house. The committee is authorized to meet and act year round and
to employ the necessary personnel within the limits of appropriations. The staff of the
committee on legislative research, house research, and senate research shall provide necessary
clerical, research, fiscal, and legal services to the committee, as the committee may request.
2. It shall be the duty of the committee:
(1) To make a continuing study and analysis of the current and proposed tax policy of
this state as it relates to:
(a) Fairness and equity;
(b) True economic impact;
(c) Burden on individuals and businesses;

HB 2626 3
(d) Effectiveness of tax expenditures;
(e) Impact on political subdivisions of this state;
(f) Agreements and contracts with the federal government, other states and territories,
political subdivisions, and private entities relating to the collection and administration of state
and local taxes and fees;
(g) Compliance with the state and United States Constitution and federal and
international law; and
(h) The effects of interstate commerce;
(2) To make a continuing study and review of the department of revenue, the
department of economic development, the state [tax] assessment commission or its
successor entity, and any other state agency, commission, or state executive office
responsible for the administration of tax policies;
(3) To study the effects of the coupling or decoupling with the federal income tax
code as it relates to the state income tax;
(4) To make recommendations, as and when the committee deems fit, to the general
assembly for legislative action or to report findings and to the departments, commissions, and
offices for administrative or procedural changes;
(5) To study the effects of a sales tax holiday; and
(6) To examine and assess the public benefit of any tax credit program that is the
subject of an audit by the state auditor pursuant to section 620.1300 and provide a report to
the general assembly and the governor with the committee's findings and recommendations, if
any, regarding such tax credit program within six months of receiving the audit report.
3. All state departments, commissions, and offices responsible for the administration
of tax policies shall cooperate with and assist the committee in the performance of its duties
and shall make available all books, records and information requested, except individually
identifiable information regarding a specific taxpayer. The committee may also consult with
public and private universities and academies, public and private organizations, and private
citizens in the performance of its duties. The committee may contract with public and private
entities, within the limits of appropriation, for analysis and study of current or proposed
changes to state and local tax policy. The committee shall have the power to subpoena
witnesses, take testimony under oath, compel the attendance of witnesses, the giving of
testimony and the production of records.
48.020. 1. All counties of this state are hereby classified, for the purpose of
establishing organization and powers in accordance with the provisions of Section 8, Article
VI, Constitution of Missouri, into four classifications determined as follows:
Classification 1. All counties having an assessed valuation of nine hundred million
dollars and over shall automatically be in the first classification after that county has

HB 2626 4
maintained such valuation for the time period required by section 48.030; however, any
county of the second classification which, on August 28, 2010, has had an assessed valuation
of at least six hundred million dollars for at least one year may, by resolution of the governing
body of the county, elect to be classified as a county of the first classification after it has
maintained such valuation for the period of time required by the provisions of section 48.030.
Classification 2. All counties having an assessed valuation of six hundred million
dollars and less than the assessed valuation necessary for that county to be in the first
classification shall automatically be in the second classification after that county has
maintained such valuation for the time period required by section 48.030.
Classification 3. All counties having an assessed valuation of less than the assessed
valuation necessary for that county to be in the second classification shall automatically be in
the third classification.
Classification 4. All counties which have attained the second classification prior to
August 13, 1988, and which would otherwise return to the third classification after August 13,
1988, because of changes in assessed valuation shall remain a county in the second
classification and shall operate under the laws of this state applying to the second
classification.
2. The required assessed valuation for each classification under subsection 1 of this
section shall be increased annually by an amount equal to the percentage change in the annual
average of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) or zero, whichever is
greater. The state [tax] assessment commission, or its successor entity, shall calculate and
publish this amount so that it is available to all counties.
50.610. After the budget hearings, the county commission may revise, alter, increase
or decrease the items contained in the budget and may eliminate any item or add new items.
If it increases the total proposed expenditures from any fund so that the total proposed
expenditures exceed the total estimated income, it shall also make provision for the necessary
additional income so that the budget as adopted shall provide revenue at least equal to
expenditures for each fund. Any cash surplus at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried
forward and merged with the revenues of the succeeding year. Payment of any legal unpaid
obligations of any prior year, however, shall be a first charge in the budget against the
revenues of the budget year. Except as herein provided, the budget shall be adopted and the
appropriation order finally made at least ten days after the beginning of the fiscal year. At the
same time, the county commission shall tentatively fix the tax rate necessary to finance and
balance the budget. At the same time, also, a statement shall be prepared and made public
showing the changes made by the county commission in the budget. The final tax rate need
not be fixed until final action by the state [tax] assessment commission, or its successor
entity, on the assessment made by the county assessor. In any year in which the terms of any

HB 2626 5
of the commissioners of the county commission in counties of classes one and two expire, the
budget shall be approved and the appropriation order made by the new commission within
thirty days after the beginning of the fiscal year.
53.081. The assessor in each county, except counties of the first class having a charter
form of government, in addition to other duties provided by law, shall each calendar month
verify ten sales of real property made within his or her county during that month and shall
make a report of these sales to the state [tax] assessmentcommission, or its successor entity.
The report of each such sale shall contain:
(1) The name of the grantor;
(2) The name of the grantee;
(3) The amount of consideration when available; and if not available then the assessor
shall reassess the property;
(4) The amount at which the property is currently assessed;
(5) Whether or not the sale involved newly constructed property; and
(6) The name of the person verifying the sale.
53.250. As used in sections 53.250 to [53.265] 53.270, unless the context clearly
indicated otherwise, the following words mean:
(1) "Assessor or assessing officer", county assessor of all second, third, and fourth
class counties, and all first class counties without a charter form of government and the
assessing officer of the city of St. Louis;
(2) "Assessor-elect", a person who has been elected or appointed to the office of
county assessor in any second, third, or fourth class county or any first class county without a
charter form of government, or as the assessing officer of the City of St. Louis, but who has
not yet begun his or her term of office;
(3) "Commission", state [tax] assessment commission, or its successor entity;
(4) "Course of study", course or courses approved by the [state tax] commission.
100.050. 1. Any municipality proposing to carry out a project for industrial
development shall first, by majority vote of the governing body of the municipality, approve
the plan for the project. The plan shall include the following information pertaining to the
proposed project:
(1) A description of the project;
(2) An estimate of the cost of the project;
(3) A statement of the source of funds to be expended for the project;
(4) A statement of the terms upon which the facilities to be provided by the project
are to be leased or otherwise disposed of by the municipality; and
(5) Such other information necessary to meet the requirements of sections 100.010 to
100.200.

HB 2626 6
2. If the plan for the project is approved after August 28, 2003, and the project plan
involves issuance of revenue bonds or involves conveyance of a fee interest in property to a
municipality, the project plan shall additionally include the following information:
(1) A statement identifying each school district, community college district,
ambulance district board operating under chapter 190, fire protection district board operating
under chapter 321, county, or city affected by such project except property assessed by the
state [tax] assessment commission pursuant to chapters 151 and 153;
(2) The most recent equalized assessed valuation of the real property and personal
property included in the project, and an estimate as to the equalized assessed valuation of real
property and personal property included in the project after development;
(3) An analysis of the costs and benefits of the project on each school district,
community college district, ambulance district board operating under chapter 190, fire
protection district board operating under chapter 321, county, or city; and
(4) Identification of any payments in lieu of taxes expected to be made by any lessee
of the project, and the disposition of any such payments by the municipality.
3. If the plan for the project is approved after August 28, 2003, any payments in lieu
of taxes expected to be made by any lessee of the project shall be applied in accordance with
this section. The lessee may reimburse the municipality for its actual costs of issuing the
bonds and administering the plan. All amounts paid in excess of such actual costs shall,
immediately upon receipt thereof, be disbursed by the municipality's treasurer or other
financial officer to each school district, community college district, ambulance district board
operating under chapter 190, fire protection district board operating under chapter 321,
county, or city in proportion to the current ad valorem tax levy of each school district,
community college district, ambulance district board operating under chapter 190, fire
protection district board operating under chapter 321, county, or city; however, in any county
of the first classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but fewer than
ninety-three thousand nine hundred inhabitants, or any county of the first classification with
more than one hundred thirty-five thousand four hundred but fewer than one hundred thirty-
five thousand five hundred inhabitants, if the plan for the project is approved after May 15,
2005, such amounts shall be disbursed by the municipality's treasurer or other financial
officer to each affected taxing entity in proportion to the current ad valorem tax levy of each
affected taxing entity.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3 of this section to the contrary,
beginning August 28, 2018, any district or county imposing a property tax for the purposes of
providing emergency services under chapter 190 or 321 to the project area shall be entitled to
be reimbursed in an amount that is at least fifty percent but not more than one hundred
percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenues that such district or county would

HB 2626 7
have received in the absence of a tax abatement or exemption provided to property included
in the project. An ambulance district board operating under chapter 190, a fire protection
district board operating under chapter 321, or the governing body of a county operating a 911
center providing emergency or dispatch services under chapter 190 or 321 shall annually set
the reimbursement rate provided in this subsection prior to the time the assessment is
determined by the assessor of the county in which the project is located, or, if not located
within a county, then the assessor of such city. If the plan is amended by ordinance or by any
other means after August 28, 2018, the ambulance or fire protection district or the governing
body of a county operating a 911 center providing emergency or dispatch services under
chapter 190 or 321 shall have the right to recalculate the reimbursement rate pursuant to this
subsection.
137.010. The following words, terms and phrases when used in laws governing
taxation and revenue in the state of Missouri shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this
section, except when the context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) "Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition" shall mean
grains and feeds including, but not limited to, soybeans, cow peas, wheat, corn, oats, barley,
kafir, rye, flax, grain sorghums, cotton, and such other products as are usually stored in grain
and other elevators and on farms; but excluding such grains and other agricultural crops after
being processed into products of such processing, when packaged or sacked. The term
"processing" shall not include hulling, cleaning, drying, grating, or polishing;
(2) "Hydroelectric power generating equipment", very-low-head turbine generators
with a nameplate generating capacity of at least four hundred kilowatts but not more than six
hundred kilowatts and machinery and equipment used directly in the production, generation,
conversion, storage, or conveyance of hydroelectric power to land-based devices and
appurtenances used in the transmission of electrical energy;
(3) "Intangible personal property", for the purpose of taxation, shall include all
property other than real property and tangible personal property, as defined by this section;
(4) "Real property" includes land itself, whether laid out in town lots or otherwise,
and all growing crops, buildings, structures, improvements and fixtures of whatever kind
thereon, hydroelectric power generating equipment, the installed poles used in the
transmission or reception of electrical energy, audio signals, video signals or similar
purposes, provided the owner of such installed poles is also an owner of a fee simple interest,
possessor of an easement, holder of a license or franchise, or is the beneficiary of a right-of-
way dedicated for public utility purposes for the underlying land; attached wires,
transformers, amplifiers, substations, and other such devices and appurtenances used in the
transmission or reception of electrical energy, audio signals, video signals or similar purposes
when owned by the owner of the installed poles, otherwise such items are considered personal

HB 2626 8
property; and stationary property used for transportation or storage of liquid and gaseous
products, including, but not limited to, petroleum products, natural gas, propane or LP gas
equipment, water, and sewage;
(5) "Reliever airport", any land and improvements, exclusive of structures, on
privately owned airports that qualify as reliever airports under the National Plan of Integrated
Airport Systems that may receive federal airport improvement project funds through the
Federal Aviation Administration;
(6) "Tangible personal property" includes every tangible thing being the subject of
ownership or part ownership whether animate or inanimate, other than money, and not
forming part or parcel of real property as herein defined, but does not include household
goods, furniture, wearing apparel and articles of personal use and adornment, as defined by
the [state tax] commission, owned and used by a person in his or herhome or dwelling place.
Tangible personal property shall include solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related
solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar
photovoltaic energy systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section
144.030, that were constructed and producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022.
137.016. 1. As used in Section 4(b) of Article X of the [Missouri] Constitution of
Missouri, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential property", all real property improved by a structure which is used or
intended to be used for residential living by human occupants, vacant land in connection with
an airport, land used as a golf course, manufactured home parks, bed and breakfast inns in
which the owner resides and uses as a primary residence with six or fewer rooms for rent, and
time-share units as defined in section 407.600, except to the extent such units are actually
rented and subject to sales tax under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020, but
residential property shall not include other similar facilities used primarily for transient
housing. For the purposes of this section, "transient housing" means all rooms available for
rent or lease for which the receipts from the rent or lease of such rooms are subject to state
sales tax pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section 144.020;
(2) "Agricultural and horticultural property", all real property used for agricultural
purposes and devoted primarily to the raising and harvesting of crops; to the feeding,
breeding and management of livestock which shall include breeding, showing, and boarding
of horses; to dairying, or to any other combination thereof; and buildings and structures
customarily associated with farming, agricultural, and horticultural uses. Agricultural and
horticultural property shall also include land devoted to and qualifying for payments or other
compensation under a soil conservation or agricultural assistance program under an
agreement with an agency of the federal government. Agricultural and horticultural property
shall further include any reliever airport. Real property classified as forest croplands shall not

HB 2626 9
be agricultural or horticultural property so long as it is classified as forest croplands and shall
be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7 of Article X of the
[Missouri] Constitution of Missouri. Agricultural and horticultural property shall also
include any sawmill or planing mill defined in the U.S. Department of Labor's Standard
Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual under Industry Group 242 with the SIC number 2421.
Agricultural and horticultural property shall also include urban and community gardens. For
the purposes of this section, "urban and community gardens" shall include real property
cultivated by residents of a neighborhood or community for the purposes of providing
agricultural products, as defined in section 262.900, for the use of residents of the
neighborhood or community, and shall not include a garden intended for individual or
personal use;
(3) "Utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real property", all real property
used directly or indirectly for any commercial, mining, industrial, manufacturing, trade,
professional, business, or similar purpose, including all property centrally assessed by the
[state tax] commission but shall not include floating docks, portions of which are separately
owned and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership and in which no one
person or business entity owns more than five individual units. All other real property not
included in the property listed in subclasses (1) and (2) of Section 4(b) of Article X of the
[Missouri] Constitution of Missouri, as such property is defined in this section, shall be
deemed to be included in the term "utility, industrial, commercial, railroad and other real
property".
2. Pursuant to Article X of the state Constitution, any taxing district may adjust its
operating levy to recoup any loss of property tax revenue, except revenues from the surtax
imposed pursuant to Article X, Subsection 2 of Section 6 of the Constitution of Missouri, as
the result of changing the classification of structures intended to be used for residential living
by human occupants which contain five or more dwelling units if such adjustment of the levy
does not exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax year. For purposes of
this section, loss in revenue shall include the difference between the revenue that would have
been collected on such property under its classification prior to enactment of this section and
the amount to be collected under its classification under this section. The county assessor of
each county or city not within a county shall provide information to each taxing district within
its boundaries regarding the difference in assessed valuation of such property as the result of
such change in classification.
3. All reclassification of property as the result of changing the classification of
structures intended to be used for residential living by human occupants which contain five or
more dwelling units shall apply to assessments made after December 31, 1994.

HB 2626 10
4. Where real property is used or held for use for more than one purpose and such
uses result in different classifications, the county assessor shall allocate to each classification
the percentage of the true value in money of the property devoted to each use; except that,
where agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in this section, also contains a
dwelling unit or units, the farm dwelling, appurtenant residential-related structures and up to
five acres immediately surrounding such farm dwelling shall be residential property, as
defined in this section, provided that the portion of property used or held for use as an urban
and community garden shall not be residential property. This subsection shall not apply to
any reliever airport.
5. All real property which is vacant, unused, or held for future use; which is used for a
private club, a not-for-profit or other nonexempt lodge, club, business, trade, service
organization, or similar entity; or for which a determination as to its classification cannot be
made under the definitions set out in subsection 1 of this section, shall be classified according
to its immediate most suitable economic use, which use shall be determined after
consideration of:
(1) Immediate prior use, if any, of such property;
(2) Location of such property;
(3) Zoning classification of such property; except that, such zoning classification
shall not be considered conclusive if, upon consideration of all factors, it is determined that
such zoning classification does not reflect the immediate most suitable economic use of the
property;
(4) Other legal restrictions on the use of such property;
(5) Availability of water, electricity, gas, sewers, street lighting, and other public
services for such property;
(6) Size of such property;
(7) Access of such property to public thoroughfares; and
(8) Any other factors relevant to a determination of the immediate most suitable
economic use of such property.
6. All lands classified as forest croplands shall not, for taxation purposes, be
classified as subclass (1), subclass (2), or subclass (3) real property, as such classes are
prescribed in Section 4(b) of Article X of the [Missouri] Constitution of Missouriand defined
in this section, but shall be taxed in accordance with the laws enacted to implement Section 7
of Article X of the [Missouri] Constitution of Missouri.
137.021. 1. The assessor, in grading land which is devoted primarily to the raising
and harvesting of crops, to the feeding, breeding and management of livestock, to dairying, or
to any combination thereof, as [defined] described in the definition of agricultural and
horticultural property in section 137.016, pursuant to the provisions of sections 137.017 to

HB 2626 11
137.021, shall in addition to the assessor's personal knowledge, judgment and experience,
consider soil surveys, decreases in land valuation due to natural disasters, level of flood
protection, governmental regulations limiting the use of such land, the estate held in such
land, and other relevant information. On or before December thirty-first of each odd-
numbered year, the [state tax] commission shall promulgate by regulation and publish a value
based on productive capability for each of the several grades of agricultural and horticultural
land. If such rules are not disapproved by the general assembly in the manner set out below,
they shall take effect on January first of the next odd-numbered year. Such values shall be
based upon soil surveys, soil productivity indexes, production costs, crop yields, appropriate
capitalization rates and any other pertinent factors, all of which may be provided by the
college of agriculture of the University of Missouri, and shall be used by all county assessors
in conjunction with their land grades in determining assessed values. Any regulation
promulgated pursuant to this subsection shall be deemed to be beyond the scope and authority
provided in this subsection if the general assembly, within the first sixty calendar days of the
regular session immediately following the promulgation of such regulation, by concurrent
resolution, shall disapprove the values contained in such regulation. If the general assembly
so disapproves any regulation promulgated pursuant to this subsection, the [state tax]
commission shall continue to use values set forth in the most recent preceding regulation
promulgated pursuant to this subsection.
2. Any land which is used as an urban or community garden, as defined in section
137.016, shall be graded as grade #4, or its equivalent, under the rule promulgated by the
[state tax] commission under subsection 1 of this section.
3. When land that is agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in section
137.016, and is being valued and assessed for general property tax purposes pursuant to the
provisions of sections 137.017 to 137.021 becomes property other than agricultural and
horticultural property, as defined in section 137.016, it shall be reassessed as of the following
January first.
4. Separation or split-off of a part of the land which is being valued and assessed for
general property tax purposes pursuant to the provisions of sections 137.017 to 137.021,
either by conveyance or other action of the owner of the land, so that such land is no longer
agricultural and horticultural property, as defined in section 137.016, shall subject the land so
separated to reassessment as of the following January first. This shall not impair the right of
the remaining land to continuance of valuation and assessment for general property tax
purposes pursuant to the provisions of sections 137.017 to 137.021.
137.022. 1. As used in this section, "private car company" means any person,
association, company or corporation, not being the owner or lessee of a railroad or street
railway company, engaged in the business of furnishing or leasing any railroad cars, except

HB 2626 12
dining, buffet, chair, parlor, palace or sleeping cars, which are used in the operation of any
railroad or street railway company, wholly or partly within this state, or when owning and
operating, or operating, any railroad freight, refrigerator or tank car on railway lines in this
state for the transportation of his, her, or its goods, wares, merchandise or products. As used
in this section, "commission", means the Missouri state [tax] assessment commission, or its
successor entity.
2. The property of private car companies is subject to assessment and ad valorem
taxation; however, the equipment owned by such companies known as "flanged wheel
equipment" shall be assessed by the commission and shall be taxed in the manner provided in
this section.
137.073. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "General reassessment", changes in value, entered in the assessor's books, of a
substantial portion of the parcels of real property within a county resulting wholly or partly
from reappraisal of value or other actions of the assessor or county equalization body or
ordered by the [state tax] commission or any court;
(2) "Tax rate", "rate", or "rate of levy", singular or plural, includes the tax rate for
each purpose of taxation of property a taxing authority is authorized to levy without a vote
and any tax rate authorized by election, including bond interest and sinking fund;
(3) "Tax rate ceiling", a tax rate as revised by the taxing authority to comply with the
provisions of this section or when a court has determined the tax rate; except that, other
provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, a school district may levy the operating
levy for school purposes required for the current year pursuant to subsection 2 of section
163.021, less all adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the [Missouri]
Constitution of Missouri, if such tax rate does not exceed the highest tax rate in effect
subsequent to the 1980 tax year. This is the maximum tax rate that may be levied, unless a
higher tax rate ceiling is approved by voters of the political subdivision as provided in this
section;
(4) "Tax revenue", when referring to the previous year, means the actual receipts from
ad valorem levies on all classes of property, including state-assessed property, in the
immediately preceding fiscal year of the political subdivision, plus an allowance for taxes
billed but not collected in the fiscal year and plus an additional allowance for the revenue
which would have been collected from property which was annexed by such political
subdivision but which was not previously used in determining tax revenue pursuant to this
section. The term "tax revenue" shall not include any receipts from ad valorem levies on any
property of a railroad corporation or a public utility, as these terms are defined in section
386.020, which were assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the previous year but are
assessed by the [state tax] commission in the current year. All school districts and those

HB 2626 13
counties levying sales taxes pursuant to chapter 67 shall include in the calculation of tax
revenue an amount equivalent to that by which they reduced property tax levies as a result of
sales tax pursuant to section 67.505 and section 164.013 [or as excess home dock city or
county fees as provided in subsection 4 of section 313.820] in the immediately preceding
fiscal year but not including any amount calculated to adjust for prior years. For purposes of
political subdivisions which were authorized to levy a tax in the prior year but which did not
levy such tax or levied a reduced rate, the term "tax revenue", as used in relation to the
revision of tax levies mandated by law, shall mean the revenues equal to the amount that
would have been available if the voluntary rate reduction had not been made.
2. Whenever changes in assessed valuation are entered in the assessor's books for any
personal property, in the aggregate, or for any subclass of real property as such subclasses are
established in Section 4(b) of Article X of the [Missouri] Constitution of Missouri and
defined in section 137.016, the county clerk in all counties and the assessor of St. Louis City
shall notify each political subdivision wholly or partially within the county or St. Louis City
of the change in valuation of each subclass of real property, individually, and personal
property, in the aggregate, exclusive of new construction and improvements. All political
subdivisions shall immediately revise the applicable rates of levy for each purpose for each
subclass of real property, individually, and personal property, in the aggregate, for which taxes
are levied to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable property, exclusive of new
construction and improvements, substantially the same amount of tax revenue as was
produced in the previous year for each subclass of real property, individually, and personal
property, in the aggregate, except that the rate shall not exceed the greater of the most recent
voter-approved rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted under subdivision (2)
of subsection 5 of this section. Any political subdivision that has received approval from
voters for a tax increase after August 27, 2008, may levy a rate to collect substantially the
same amount of tax revenue as the amount of revenue that would have been derived by
applying the voter-approved increased tax rate ceiling to the total assessed valuation of the
political subdivision as most recently certified by the city or county clerk on or before the date
of the election in which such increase is approved, increased by the percentage increase in the
consumer price index, as provided by law, except that the rate shall not exceed the greater of
the most recent voter-approved rate or the most recent voter-approved rate as adjusted under
subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of this section. Such tax revenue shall not include any receipts
from ad valorem levies on any real property which was assessed by the assessor of a county
or city in such previous year but is assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current
year in a different subclass of real property. Where the taxing authority is a school district for
the purposes of revising the applicable rates of levy for each subclass of real property, the tax
revenues from state-assessed railroad and utility property shall be apportioned and attributed

HB 2626 14
to each subclass of real property based on the percentage of the total assessed valuation of the
county that each subclass of real property represents in the current [taxable] tax year. As
provided in Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri, a political subdivision
may also revise each levy to allow for inflationary assessment growth occurring within the
political subdivision. The inflationary growth factor for any such subclass of real property or
personal property shall be limited to the actual assessment growth in such subclass or class,
exclusive of new construction and improvements, and exclusive of the assessed value on any
real property which was assessed by the assessor of a county or city in the current year in a
different subclass of real property, but not to exceed the consumer price index or five percent,
whichever is lower. Should the tax revenue of a political subdivision from the various tax
rates determined in this subsection be different than the tax revenue that would have been
determined from a single tax rate as calculated pursuant to the method of calculation in this
subsection prior to January 1, 2003, then the political subdivision shall revise the tax rates of
those subclasses of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate, in
which there is a tax rate reduction, pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. Such
revision shall yield an amount equal to such difference and shall be apportioned among such
subclasses of real property, individually, and/or personal property, in the aggregate, based on
the relative assessed valuation of the class or subclasses of property experiencing a tax rate
reduction. Such revision in the tax rates of each class or subclass shall be made by computing
the percentage of current year adjusted assessed valuation of each class or subclass with a tax
rate reduction to the total current year adjusted assessed valuation of the class or subclasses
with a tax rate reduction, multiplying the resulting percentages by the revenue difference
between the single rate calculation and the calculations pursuant to this subsection and
dividing by the respective adjusted current year assessed valuation of each class or subclass to
determine the adjustment to the rate to be levied upon each class or subclass of property. The
adjustment computed herein shall be multiplied by one hundred, rounded to four decimals in
the manner provided in this subsection, and added to the initial rate computed for each class
or subclass of property. For school districts that levy separate tax rates on each subclass of
real property and personal property in the aggregate, if voters approved a ballot before
January 1, 2011, that presented separate stated tax rates to be applied to the different
subclasses of real property and personal property in the aggregate, or increases the separate
rates that may be levied on the different subclasses of real property and personal property in
the aggregate by different amounts, the tax rate that shall be used for the single tax rate
calculation shall be a blended rate, calculated in the manner provided under subdivision (1) of
subsection 6 of this section. Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the contrary,
100 no revision to the rate of levy for personal property shall cause such levy to increase over the
101 levy for personal property from the prior year.

HB 2626 15
102 3. (1) Where the taxing authority is a school district, it shall be required to revise the
103 rates of levy to the extent necessary to produce from all taxable property, including state-
104 assessed railroad and utility property, which shall be separately estimated in addition to other
105 data required in complying with section 164.011, substantially the amount of tax revenue
106 permitted in this section. In the year following tax rate reduction, the tax rate ceiling may be
107 adjusted to offset such district's reduction in the apportionment of state school moneys due to
108 its reduced tax rate. However, in the event any school district, in calculating a tax rate ceiling
109 pursuant to this section, requiring the estimating of effects of state-assessed railroad and
110 utility valuation or loss of state aid, discovers that the estimates used result in receipt of
111 excess revenues, which would have required a lower rate if the actual information had been
112 known, the school district shall reduce the tax rate ceiling in the following year to compensate
113 for the excess receipts, and the recalculated rate shall become the tax rate ceiling for purposes
114 of this section.
115 (2) For any political subdivision which experiences a reduction in the amount of
116 assessed valuation relating to a prior year, due to decisions of the [state tax] commission or a
117 court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433, or due to clerical errors or corrections in the
118 calculation or recordation of any assessed valuation:
119 (a) Such political subdivision may revise the tax rate ceiling for each purpose it levies
120 taxes to compensate for the reduction in assessed value occurring after the political
121 subdivision calculated the tax rate ceiling for the particular subclass of real property or for
122 personal property, in the aggregate, in a prior year. Such revision by the political subdivision
123 shall be made at the time of the next calculation of the tax rate for the particular subclass of
124 real property or for personal property, in the aggregate, after the reduction in assessed
125 valuation has been determined and shall be calculated in a manner that results in the revised
126 tax rate ceiling being the same as it would have been had the corrected or finalized assessment
127 been available at the time of the prior calculation;
128 (b) In addition, for up to three years following the determination of the reduction in
129 assessed valuation as a result of circumstances defined in this subdivision, such political
130 subdivision may levy a tax rate for each purpose it levies taxes above the revised tax rate
131 ceiling provided in paragraph (a) of this subdivision to recoup any revenues it was entitled to
132 receive had the corrected or finalized assessment been available at the time of the prior
133 calculation.
134 4. (1) In order to implement the provisions of this section and Section 22 of Article X
135 of the Constitution of Missouri, the term improvements shall apply to both real and personal
136 property. In order to determine the value of new construction and improvements, each county
137 assessor shall maintain a record of real property valuations in such a manner as to identify
138 each year the increase in valuation for each political subdivision in the county as a result of

HB 2626 16
139 new construction and improvements. The value of new construction and improvements shall
140 include the additional assessed value of all improvements or additions to real property which
141 were begun after and were not part of the prior year's assessment, except that the additional
142 assessed value of all improvements or additions to real property which had been totally or
143 partially exempt from ad valorem taxes pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865, sections
144 135.200 to 135.255, and section 353.110 shall be included in the value of new construction
145 and improvements when the property becomes totally or partially subject to assessment and
146 payment of all ad valorem taxes. The aggregate increase in valuation of personal property for
147 the current year over that of the previous year is the equivalent of the new construction and
148 improvements factor for personal property. Notwithstanding any opt-out implemented
149 pursuant to subsection 14 of section 137.115, the assessor shall certify the amount of new
150 construction and improvements and the amount of assessed value on any real property which
151 was assessed by the assessor of a county or city in such previous year but is assessed by the
152 assessor of a county or city in the current year in a different subclass of real property
153 separately for each of the three subclasses of real property for each political subdivision to the
154 county clerk in order that political subdivisions shall have this information for the purpose of
155 calculating tax rates pursuant to this section and Section 22, Article X, Constitution of
156 Missouri. In addition, the [state tax] commission shall certify each year to each county clerk
157 the increase in the general price level as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban
158 Consumers for the United States, or its successor publications, as defined and officially
159 reported by the United States Department of Labor, or its successor agency. The [state tax]
160 commission shall certify the increase in such index on the latest twelve-month basis available
161 on February first of each year over the immediately preceding prior twelve-month period in
162 order that political subdivisions shall have this information available in setting their tax rates
163 according to law and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri. For purposes of
164 implementing the provisions of this section and Section 22 of Article X of the [Missouri]
165 Constitution of Missouri, the term "property" means all taxable property, including state-
166 assessed property.
167 (2) Each political subdivision required to revise rates of levy pursuant to this section
168 or Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri shall calculate each tax rate it is
169 authorized to levy and, in establishing each tax rate, shall consider each provision for tax rate
170 revision provided in this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri,
171 separately and without regard to annual tax rate reductions provided in section 67.505 and
172 section 164.013. Each political subdivision shall set each tax rate it is authorized to levy
173 using the calculation that produces the lowest tax rate ceiling. It is further the intent of the
174 general assembly, pursuant to the authority of Section 10(c) of Article X of the Constitution
175 of Missouri, that the provisions of such section be applicable to tax rate revisions mandated

HB 2626 17
176 pursuant to Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri as to reestablishing tax
177 rates as revised in subsequent years, enforcement provisions, and other provisions not in
178 conflict with Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of Missouri. Annual tax rate
179 reductions provided in section 67.505 and section 164.013 shall be applied to the tax rate as
180 established pursuant to this section and Section 22 of Article X of the Constitution of
181 Missouri, unless otherwise provided by law.
182 5. (1) In all political subdivisions, the tax rate ceiling established pursuant to this
183 section shall not be increased unless approved by a vote of the people. Approval of the higher
184 tax rate shall be by at least a majority of votes cast. When a proposed higher tax rate requires
185 approval by more than a simple majority pursuant to any provision of law or the constitution,
186 the tax rate increase must receive approval by at least the majority required.
187 (2) When voters approve an increase in the tax rate, the amount of the increase shall
188 be added to the tax rate ceiling as calculated pursuant to this section to the extent the total rate
189 does not exceed any maximum rate prescribed by law. If a ballot question presents a stated
190 tax rate for approval rather than describing the amount of increase in the question, the stated
191 tax rate approved shall be adjusted as provided in this section and, so adjusted, shall be the
192 current tax rate ceiling. The increased tax rate ceiling as approved shall be adjusted such that
193 when applied to the current total assessed valuation of the political subdivision, excluding
194 new construction and improvements since the date of the election approving such increase,
195 the revenue derived from the adjusted tax rate ceiling is equal to the sum of: the amount of
196 revenue which would have been derived by applying the voter-approved increased tax rate
197 ceiling to total assessed valuation of the political subdivision, as most recently certified by the
198 city or county clerk on or before the date of the election in which such increase is approved,
199 increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price index, as provided by law. Such
200 adjusted tax rate ceiling may be applied to the total assessed valuation of the political
201 subdivision at the setting of the next tax rate. If a ballot question presents a phased-in tax rate
202 increase, upon voter approval, each tax rate increase shall be adjusted in the manner
203 prescribed in this section to yield the sum of: the amount of revenue that would be derived by
204 applying such voter-approved increased rate to the total assessed valuation, as most recently
205 certified by the city or county clerk on or before the date of the election in which such
206 increase was approved, increased by the percentage increase in the consumer price index, as
207 provided by law, from the date of the election to the time of such increase and, so adjusted,
208 shall be the current tax rate ceiling.
209 (3) The governing body of any political subdivision may levy a tax rate lower than its
210 tax rate ceiling and may, in a nonreassessment year, increase that lowered tax rate to a level
211 not exceeding the tax rate ceiling without voter approval in the manner provided under
212 subdivision (4) of this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a

HB 2626 18
213 political subdivision from voluntarily levying a tax rate lower than that which is required
214 under the provisions of this section or from seeking voter approval of a reduction to such
215 political subdivision's tax rate ceiling.
216 (4) In a year of general reassessment, a governing body whose tax rate is lower than
217 its tax rate ceiling shall revise its tax rate pursuant to the provisions of subsection 4 of this
218 section as if its tax rate was at the tax rate ceiling. In a year following general reassessment, if
219 such governing body intends to increase its tax rate, the governing body shall conduct a
220 public hearing, and in a public meeting it shall adopt an ordinance, resolution, or policy
221 statement justifying its action prior to setting and certifying its tax rate. The provisions of this
222 subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision which levies a tax rate lower than its
223 tax rate ceiling solely due to a reduction required by law resulting from sales tax collections.
224 The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any political subdivision which has
225 received voter approval for an increase to its tax rate ceiling subsequent to setting its most
226 recent tax rate.
227 6. (1) For the purposes of calculating state aid for public schools pursuant to section
228 163.031, each taxing authority which is a school district shall determine its proposed tax rate
229 as a blended rate of the classes or subclasses of property. Such blended rate shall be
230 calculated by first determining the total tax revenue of the property within the jurisdiction of
231 the taxing authority, which amount shall be equal to the sum of the products of multiplying
232 the assessed valuation of each class and subclass of property by the corresponding tax rate for
233 such class or subclass, then dividing the total tax revenue by the total assessed valuation of
234 the same jurisdiction, and then multiplying the resulting quotient by a factor of one hundred.
235 Where the taxing authority is a school district, such blended rate shall also be used by such
236 school district for calculating revenue from state-assessed railroad and utility property as
237 defined in chapter 151 and for apportioning the tax rate by purpose.
238 (2) Each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate in any year shall notify the clerk
239 of the county commission in the county or counties where the tax rate applies of its tax rate
240 ceiling and its proposed tax rate. Each taxing authority shall express its proposed tax rate in a
241 fraction equal to the nearest one-tenth of a cent, unless its proposed tax rate is in excess of one
242 dollar, then one/one-hundredth of a cent. If a taxing authority shall round to one/one-
243 hundredth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-thousandth of
244 one cent to the next higher one/one-hundredth of a cent; if a taxing authority shall round to
245 one-tenth of a cent, it shall round up a fraction greater than or equal to five/one-hundredths of
246 a cent to the next higher one-tenth of a cent. Any taxing authority levying a property tax rate
247 shall provide data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by rule,
248 substantiating such tax rate complies with Missouri law. All forms for the calculation of rates
249 pursuant to this section shall be promulgated as a rule and shall not be incorporated by

HB 2626 19
250 reference. The state auditor shall promulgate rules for any and all forms for the calculation of
251 rates pursuant to this section which do not currently exist in rule form or that have been
252 incorporated by reference. In addition, each taxing authority proposing to levy a tax rate for
253 debt service shall provide data, in such form as shall be prescribed by the state auditor by rule,
254 substantiating the tax rate for debt service complies with Missouri law. A tax rate proposed
255 for annual debt service requirements will be prima facie valid if, after making the payment for
256 which the tax was levied, bonds remain outstanding and the debt fund reserves do not exceed
257 the following year's payments. The county clerk shall keep on file and available for public
258 inspection all such information for a period of three years. The clerk shall, within three days
259 of receipt, forward a copy of the notice of a taxing authority's tax rate ceiling and proposed
260 tax rate and any substantiating data to the state auditor. The state auditor shall, within fifteen
261 days of the date of receipt, examine such information and return to the county clerk his or her
262 findings as to compliance of the tax rate ceiling with this section and as to compliance of any
263 proposed tax rate for debt service with Missouri law. If the state auditor believes that a taxing
264 authority's proposed tax rate does not comply with Missouri law, then the state auditor's
265 findings shall include a recalculated tax rate, and the state auditor may request a taxing
266 authority to submit documentation supporting such taxing authority's proposed tax rate. The
267 county clerk shall immediately forward a copy of the auditor's findings to the taxing authority
268 and shall file a copy of the findings with the information received from the taxing authority.
269 The taxing authority shall have fifteen days from the date of receipt from the county clerk of
270 the state auditor's findings and any request for supporting documentation to accept or reject in
271 writing the rate change certified by the state auditor and to submit all requested information to
272 the state auditor. A copy of the taxing authority's acceptance or rejection and any information
273 submitted to the state auditor shall also be mailed to the county clerk. If a taxing authority
274 rejects a rate change certified by the state auditor and the state auditor does not receive
275 supporting information which justifies the taxing authority's original or any subsequent
276 proposed tax rate, then the state auditor shall refer the perceived violations of such taxing
277 authority to the attorney general's office and the attorney general is authorized to obtain
278 injunctive relief to prevent the taxing authority from levying a violative tax rate.
279 (3) In the event that the taxing authority incorrectly completes the forms created and
280 promulgated under subdivision (2) of this subsection, or makes a clerical error, the taxing
281 authority may submit amended forms with an explanation for the needed changes. If such
282 amended forms are filed under regulations prescribed by the state auditor, the state auditor
283 shall take into consideration such amended forms for the purposes of this subsection.
284 7. No tax rate shall be extended on the tax rolls by the county clerk unless the political
285 subdivision has complied with the foregoing provisions of this section.

HB 2626 20
286 8. Whenever a taxpayer has cause to believe that a taxing authority has not complied
287 with the provisions of this section, the taxpayer may make a formal complaint with the
288 prosecuting attorney of the county. Where the prosecuting attorney fails to bring an action
289 within ten days of the filing of the complaint, the taxpayer may bring a civil action pursuant to
290 this section and institute an action as representative of a class of all taxpayers within a taxing
291 authority if the class is so numerous that joinder of all members is impracticable, if there are
292 questions of law or fact common to the class, if the claims or defenses of the representative
293 parties are typical of the claims or defenses of the class, and if the representative parties will
294 fairly and adequately protect the interests of the class. In any class action maintained
295 pursuant to this section, the court may direct to the members of the class a notice to be
296 published at least once each week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
297 circulation published in the county where the civil action is commenced and in other counties
298 within the jurisdiction of a taxing authority. The notice shall advise each member that the
299 court will exclude him or her from the class if he or she so requests by a specified date, that
300 the judgment, whether favorable or not, will include all members who do not request
301 exclusion, and that any member who does not request exclusion may, if he or she desires,
302 enter an appearance. In any class action brought pursuant to this section, the court, in
303 addition to the relief requested, shall assess against the taxing authority found to be in
304 violation of this section the reasonable costs of bringing the action, including reasonable
305 attorney's fees, provided no attorney's fees shall be awarded any attorney or association of
306 attorneys who receive public funds from any source for their services. Any action brought
307 pursuant to this section shall be set for hearing as soon as practicable after the cause is at
308 issue.
309 9. If in any action, including a class action, the court issues an order requiring a taxing
310 authority to revise the tax rates as provided in this section or enjoins a taxing authority from
311 the collection of a tax because of its failure to revise the rate of levy as provided in this
312 section, any taxpayer paying his or her taxes when an improper rate is applied has erroneously
313 paid his or her taxes in part, whether or not the taxes are paid under protest as provided in
314 section 139.031 or otherwise contested. The part of the taxes paid erroneously is the
315 difference in the amount produced by the original levy and the amount produced by the
316 revised levy. The township or county collector of taxes or the collector of taxes in any city
317 shall refund the amount of the tax erroneously paid. The taxing authority refusing to revise
318 the rate of levy as provided in this section shall make available to the collector all funds
319 necessary to make refunds pursuant to this subsection. No taxpayer shall receive any interest
320 on any money erroneously paid by him or her pursuant to this subsection. Effective in the
321 1994 tax year, nothing in this section shall be construed to require a taxing authority to refund
322 any tax erroneously paid prior to or during the third tax year preceding the current tax year.

HB 2626 21
323 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
324 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
325 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
326 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
327 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
328 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
329 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2004, shall be invalid
330 and void.
137.076. 1. In establishing the value of a parcel of real property the county assessor
shall consider current market conditions and previous decisions of the county board of
equalization, the [state tax] commission or a court of competent jurisdiction that affected the
value of such parcel. For purposes of this section, the term "current market conditions", shall
include the impact upon the housing market of foreclosures and bank sales.
2. In establishing the value of a parcel of real property, the county assessor shall use
an income-based approach for assessment of parcels of real property with federal or state
imposed restrictions in regard to rent limitations, operations requirements, or any other
restrictions imposed upon the property in connection with:
(1) The property being eligible for any income tax credits under Section 42 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(2) Property constructed with the use of the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development HOME investment partnerships program;
(3) Property constructed with the use of incentives provided by the United States
Department of Agriculture Rural Development; or
(4) Property receiving any other state or federal subsidies provided with respect to use
of the property for housing purposes.

For the purposes of this subsection, the term "income-based approach" shall include the use of
direct capitalization methodology and computed by dividing the net operating income of the
parcel of property by an appropriate capitalization rate not to exceed the average of the
current market data available in the county of said parcel of property. Federal and state tax
credits or other subsidies shall not be used when calculating the capitalization rate. Upon
expiration of a land use restriction agreement, such parcel of property shall no longer be
subject to this subsection.
137.079. Prior to setting its rate or rates as required by section 137.073, each taxing
authority shall exclude from its total assessed valuation seventy-two percent of the total
amount of assessed value of business personal property that is the subject of an appeal at the
[state tax] commission or in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state. This exclusion

HB 2626 22
shall only apply to the portion of the assessed value of business personal property that is
disputed in the appeal, and shall not exclude any portion of the same property that is not
disputed. If the taxing authority uses a multirate approach as provided in section 137.073,
this exclusion shall be made from the personal property class. The [state tax] commission
shall provide each taxing authority with the total assessed value of business personal property
within the jurisdiction of such taxing authority for which an appeal is pending no later than
August twentieth of each year. Whenever any appeal is resolved, whether by final
adjudication or settlement, and the result of the appeal causes money to be paid to the taxing
authority, the taxing authority shall not be required to make an additional adjustment to its
rate or rates due to such payment once the deadline for setting its rates, as provided by this
chapter, has passed in a [taxable] tax year, but shall adjust its rate or rates due to such
payment in the next rate setting cycle to offset the payment in the next [taxable] taxyear. For
the purposes of this section, the term "business personal property" means tangible personal
property which is used in a trade or business or used for production of income and which has
a determinable life of longer than one year except that supplies used by a business shall also
be considered business personal property, but shall not include livestock, farm machinery,
property subject to the motor vehicle registration provisions of chapter 301, property subject
to the tables provided in section 137.078, the property of rural electric cooperatives under
chapter 394, or property assessed by the [state tax] commission under chapters 151, 153, and
155, section 137.022, and sections 137.1000 to 137.1030.
137.100. The following subjects are exempt from taxation for state, county or local
purposes:
(1) Lands and other property belonging to this state;
(2) Lands and other property belonging to any city, county or other political
subdivision in this state, including market houses, town halls and other public structures, with
their furniture and equipments, and on public squares and lots kept open for health, use or
ornament;
(3) Nonprofit cemeteries;
(4) The real estate and tangible personal property which is used exclusively for
agricultural or horticultural societies organized in this state, including not-for-profit
agribusiness associations;
(5) All property, real and personal, actually and regularly used exclusively for
religious worship, for schools and colleges, or for purposes purely charitable and not held for
private or corporate profit, except that the exemption herein granted does not include real
property not actually used or occupied for the purpose of the organization but held or used as
investment even though the income or rentals received therefrom is used wholly for religious,
educational or charitable purposes;

HB 2626 23
(6) Household goods, furniture, wearing apparel and articles of personal use and
adornment, as defined by the [state tax] commission, owned and used by a person in his or
her home or dwelling place;
(7) Motor vehicles leased for a period of at least one year to this state or to any city,
county, or political subdivision or to any religious, educational, or charitable organization
which has obtained an exemption from the payment of federal income taxes, provided the
motor vehicles are used exclusively for religious, educational, or charitable purposes;
(8) Real or personal property leased or otherwise transferred by an interstate compact
agency created pursuant to sections 70.370 to 70.430 or sections 238.010 to 238.100 to
another for which or whom such property is not exempt when immediately after the lease or
transfer, the interstate compact agency enters into a leaseback or other agreement that directly
or indirectly gives such interstate compact agency a right to use, control, and possess the
property; provided, however, that in the event of a conveyance of such property, the interstate
compact agency must retain an option to purchase the property at a future date or, within the
limitations period for reverters, the property must revert back to the interstate compact
agency. Property will no longer be exempt under this subdivision in the event of a
conveyance as of the date, if any, when:
(a) The right of the interstate compact agency to use, control, and possess the property
is terminated;
(b) The interstate compact agency no longer has an option to purchase or otherwise
acquire the property; and
(c) There are no provisions for reverter of the property within the limitation period for
reverters;
(9) All property, real and personal, belonging to veterans' organizations. As used in
this section, "veterans' organization" means any organization of veterans with a congressional
charter, that is incorporated in this state, and that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)
(19) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(10) Solar energy systems not held for resale.
137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, the assessor or the
assessor's deputies in all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis shall annually
make a list of all real and tangible personal property taxable in the assessor's city, county,
town or district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of this section and section
137.078, the assessor shall annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and one-third
percent of its true value in money as of January first of each calendar year. The assessor shall
annually assess all real property, including any new construction and improvements to real
property, and possessory interests in real property at the percent of its true value in money set
in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of any possessory interest in real

HB 2626 24
property in subclass (3), where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate airport
boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan, as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a
commercial airport having a FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political subdivision,
shall be the otherwise applicable true value in money of any such possessory interest in real
property, less the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than the political
subdivision, towards any new construction or improvements on such real property completed
after January 1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned possessory interest,
regardless of the year in which such costs were incurred or whether such costs were
considered in any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real property in the
following manner: new assessed values shall be determined as of January first of each odd-
numbered year and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same assessed values shall
apply in the following even-numbered year, except for new construction and property
improvements which shall be valued as though they had been completed as of January first of
the preceding odd-numbered year. The assessor may call at the office, place of doing
business, or residence of each person required by this chapter to list property, and require the
person to make a correct statement of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management, taxable in the county. On or before
January first of each even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a two-year
assessment maintenance plan to the county governing body and the [state tax] commission for
their respective approval or modification. The county governing body shall approve and
forward such plan or its alternative to the plan to the [state tax] commission by February first.
If the county governing body fails to forward the plan or its alternative to the plan to the [state
tax] commission by February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered approved by the
county governing body. If the [state tax] commission fails to approve a plan and if the [state
tax] commission and the assessor and the governing body of the county involved are unable to
resolve the differences, in order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section 137.750,
the county or the assessor shall petition the administrative hearing commission, by May first,
to decide all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance plan. Upon agreement
of the parties, the matter may be stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final decision of the administrative
hearing commission shall be subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the county
involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1) real property within any county with a
charter form of government, or within a city not within a county, is made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program, the burden of proof, supported by clear,
convincing and cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the assessor at any
hearing or appeal. In any such county, unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a

HB 2626 25
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer, computer-assisted method or a
computer program. Such evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal of the property by generally
accepted appraisal techniques; and
(2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three comparable properties and the
address or location thereof. As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means that:
(a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the property valuation; and
(b) Such properties are not more than one mile from the site of the disputed property,
except where no similar properties exist within one mile of the disputed property, the nearest
comparable property shall be used. Such property shall be within five hundred square feet in
size of the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in age, floor plan, number of
rooms, and other relevant characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City of St. Louis may send personal
property assessment forms through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each constitute separate subclasses
of tangible personal property and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of taxation at
the following percentages of their true value in money:
(1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an unmanufactured condition, one-half of
one percent;
(2) Livestock, twelve percent;
(3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
(4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration as and are registered as historic
motor vehicles pursuant to section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five years
old and which are used solely for noncommercial purposes and are operated less than two
hundred hours per year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five percent;
(5) Poultry, twelve percent;
(6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and tools and equipment used in
retooling for the purpose of introducing new product lines or used for making improvements
to existing products by any company which is located in a state enterprise zone and which is
identified by any standard industrial classification number cited in subdivision (7) of section
135.200, twenty-five percent; and
(7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and related solar equipment, components,
materials, and supplies installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy systems, as
described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of section 144.030, that were constructed and
producing solar energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
4. The person listing the property shall enter a true and correct statement of the
property, in a printed blank prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being filled out,

HB 2626 26
shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to as provided in section 137.155. The list shall
then be delivered to the assessor.
5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such subclasses are established in Section 4
(b) of Article X of the [Missouri] Constitution of Missouri and defined in section 137.016,
shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
(a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen percent;
(b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent; and
(c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two percent.
(2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or, if not located within a county,
then the assessor of such city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real property if the use
or purpose of such real property is changed after such property is assessed under the
provisions of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such property shall be reclassified,
he or she shall determine the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage of the
tax year that such property was classified in each subclassification.
6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010, which are actually used as
dwelling units shall be assessed at the same percentage of true value as residential real
property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of assessment of true value for such
100 manufactured homes shall be the same as for residential real property. If the county collector
101 cannot identify or find the manufactured home when attempting to attach the manufactured
102 home for payment of taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county collector may
103 request the county commission to have the manufactured home removed from the tax books,
104 and such request shall be granted within thirty days after the request is made; however, the
105 removal from the tax books does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it is
106 later identified or found. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home located in a
107 manufactured home rental park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
108 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal property. For purposes of this
109 section, a manufactured home located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
110 may be considered real property.
111 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered a parcel for the purpose of
112 reimbursement pursuant to section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to be
113 real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015 and assessed as a realty improvement
114 to the existing real estate parcel.
115 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the assessment of a manufactured
116 home shall be included on the personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
117 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of
118 section 442.015, in which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment of the

HB 2626 27
119 manufactured home as a realty improvement to the existing real estate parcel shall be
120 included on the real property tax statement of the real estate owner.
121 9. The assessor of each county and each city not within a county shall use a nationally
122 recognized automotive trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
123 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book, Edmunds, or other similar
124 publication as the recommended guide of information for determining the true value of motor
125 vehicles described in such publication. The [state tax] commission shall select and make
126 available to all assessors which publication shall be used. The assessor of each county and
127 each city not within a county shall use the trade-in value published in the current October
128 issue of the publication selected by the [state tax] commission. The assessor shall not use a
129 value that is greater than the average trade-in value in determining the true value of the motor
130 vehicle without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years
131 old or newer from a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other than average
132 without performing a physical inspection of the motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for
133 a particular motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use such information or
134 publications that, in the assessor's judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
135 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of less than fifty thousand dollars as
136 of January 1, 2025, the assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount greater
137 than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous year, provided that such motor vehicle
138 was properly assessed in the previous year.
139 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed valuation of any parcel of subclass
140 (1) real property by more than fifteen percent since the last assessment, excluding increases
141 due to new construction or improvements, the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of
142 such property.
143 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to subsection 10 of this section, the
144 assessor shall notify the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the owner
145 clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
146 inspection is required, the property owner may request that an interior inspection be
147 performed during the physical inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days to
148 notify the assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
149 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection 10 of this section, shall include,
150 but not be limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of all exterior portions of the
151 land and any buildings and improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably and
152 lawfully gain external access, and shall include an observation and review of the interior of
153 any buildings or improvements on the property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant
154 to subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or

HB 2626 28
155 the like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as required by
156 this section.
157 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards as proper form of payment of
158 outstanding property tax or license due. No county or city collector may charge surcharge for
159 payment by credit card which exceeds the fee or surcharge charged by the credit card bank,
160 processor, or issuer for its service. A county or city collector may accept payment by
161 electronic transfers of funds in payment of any tax or license and charge the person making
162 such payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the bank, processor, or issuer of
163 such electronic payment.
164 14. Any county or city not within a county in this state may, by an affirmative vote of
165 the governing body of such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and sections
166 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
167 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house committee
168 substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-
169 second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of the general
170 reassessment, prior to January first of any year. No county or city not within a county
171 shall exercise this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of this section and
172 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first
173 general assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
174 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill no.
175 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a year of general
176 reassessment. For the purposes of applying the provisions of this subsection, a political
177 subdivision contained within two or more counties where at least one of such counties has
178 opted out and at least one of such counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate as
179 in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly,
180 second regular session. A governing body of a city not within a county or a county that has
181 opted out under the provisions of this subsection may choose to implement the provisions of
182 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house bill no. 1150 of
183 the ninety-first general assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as modified by
184 house committee substitute for senate substitute for senate committee substitute for senate bill
185 no. 960, ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for the next year of general
186 reassessment, by an affirmative vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
187 any year.
188 15. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than twenty-
189 six thousand three hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants
190 located in any county that has exercised its authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this
191 section may levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal property only if such

HB 2626 29
192 city bills and collects its own property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing and
193 collection of such separate and differing tax rates. Such separate and differing rates shall not
194 exceed such city's tax rate ceiling.
195 16. Any portion of real property that is available as reserve for strip, surface, or coal
196 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that has not
197 been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be assessed based upon how the real
198 property is currently being used. Any information provided to a county assessor, [state tax]
199 the commission, state agency, or political subdivision responsible for the administration of
200 tax policies shall, in the performance of its duties, make available all books, records, and
201 information requested, except such books, records, and information as are by law declared
202 confidential in nature, including individually identifiable information regarding a specific
203 taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property. For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall
204 mean all real property that is in use or readily available as a reserve for strip, surface, or coal
205 mining for minerals for purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to others that
206 has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.122. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Business personal property", tangible personal property which is used in a trade
or business or used for production of income and which has a determinable life of longer than
one year except that supplies used by a business shall also be considered business personal
property, but shall not include livestock, farm machinery, grain and other agricultural crops in
an unmanufactured condition, property subject to the motor vehicle registration provisions of
chapter 301, property assessed under section 137.078, the property of rural electric
cooperatives under chapter 394, or property assessed by the [state tax] commission under
chapters 151, 153, and 155, section 137.022, and sections 137.1000 to 137.1030;
(2) "Class life", the class life of property as set out in the federal Modified
Accelerated Cost Recovery System life tables or their successors under the Internal Revenue
Code as amended;
(3) "Economic or functional obsolescence", a loss in value of personal property above
and beyond physical deterioration and age of the property. Such loss may be the result of
economic or functional obsolescence or both;
(4) "Original cost", the price the current owner, the taxpayer, paid for the item without
freight, installation, or sales or use tax. In the case of acquisition of items of personal
property as part of an acquisition of an entity, the original cost shall be the historical cost of
those assets remaining in place and in use and the placed-in-service date shall be the date of
acquisition by the entity being acquired;
(5) "Placed in service", property is placed in service when it is ready and available for
a specific use, whether in a business activity, an income-producing activity, a tax-exempt

HB 2626 30
activity, or a personal activity. Even if the property is not being used, the property is in
service when it is ready and available for its specific use;
(6) "Recovery period", the period over which the original cost of depreciable tangible
personal property shall be depreciated for property tax purposes and shall be the same as the
recovery period allowed for such property under the Internal Revenue Code.
2. To establish uniformity in the assessment of depreciable tangible personal property,
each assessor shall use the standardized schedule of depreciation in this section to determine
the assessed valuation of depreciable tangible personal property for the purpose of estimating
the value of such property subject to taxation under this chapter.
3. For purposes of this section, and to estimate the value of depreciable tangible
personal property for mass appraisal purposes, each assessor shall value depreciable tangible
personal property by applying the class life and recovery period to the original cost of the
property according to the following depreciation schedule. The percentage shown for the first
year shall be the percentage of the original cost used for January first of the year following the
year of acquisition of the property, and the percentage shown for each succeeding year shall
be the percentage of the original cost used for January first of the respective succeeding year
as follows:
Year Recovery Period in Years
3 5 7 10 15 20
1 75.00 85.00 89.29 92.50 95.00 96.25
2 37.50 59.50 70.16 78.62 85.50 89.03
3 12.50 41.65 55.13 66.83 76.95 82.35
4 5.00 24.99 42.88 56.81 69.25 76.18
5 10.00 30.63 48.07 62.32 70.46
6 18.38 39.33 56.09 65.18
7 10.00 30.59 50.19 60.29
8 21.85 44.29 55.77
9 15.00 38.38 51.31
10 32.48 46.85
11 26.57 42.38
12 20.67 37.92
13 15.00 33.46
14 29.00
15 24.54
16 20.08
17 20.00

HB 2626 31

Depreciable tangible personal property in all recovery periods shall continue in subsequent
years to have the depreciation factor last listed in the appropriate column so long as it is
owned or held by the taxpayer. The [state tax] commission shall study and analyze the values
established by this method of assessment and in every odd-numbered year make
recommendations to the joint committee on tax policy pertaining to any changes in this
methodology, if any, that are warranted.
4. Such estimate of value determined under this section shall be presumed to be
correct for the purpose of determining the true value in money of the depreciable tangible
personal property, but such estimation may be disproved by substantial and persuasive
evidence of the true value in money under any method determined by the [state tax]
commission to be correct, including, but not limited to, an appraisal of the tangible personal
property specifically utilizing generally accepted appraisal techniques, and contained in a
narrative appraisal report in accordance with the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice or by proof of economic or functional obsolescence or evidence of excessive
physical deterioration. For purposes of appeal of the provisions of this section, the salvage or
scrap value of depreciable tangible personal property may only be considered if the property
is not in use as of the assessment date.
5. This section shall not apply to business personal property placed in service before
January 2, 2006. Nothing in this section shall create a presumption as to the proper method of
determining the assessed valuation of business personal property placed in service before
January 2, 2006.
6. The provisions of this section are not intended to modify the definition of tangible
personal property as defined in section 137.010.
137.160. If the assessor discovers any real property, presumed to be subject to
taxation, which has not been returned to him or her by the clerk, he or she shall assess such
property and enter the same on the assessment list. And if, upon the return of such list to the
clerk, it shall appear that any such real property has not been returned by the [state tax]
commission, it shall be the duty of the clerk to advise the [state tax] commission of the facts,
describing the property so returned by the assessor, and the [state tax] commission shall
ascertain the true condition of such real property, and advise the said clerk thereof, who shall
correct the records of his or her office in accordance with the facts in the case.
137.180. 1. Whenever any assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property
he or sheshall forthwith notify the record owner of such increase, either in person, or by mail
directed to the last known address; every such increase in assessed valuation made by the
assessor shall be subject to review by the county board of equalization whereat the landowner
shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the landowner shall so state.

HB 2626 32
2. Effective January 1, 2009, for all counties with a charter form of government, other
than any county adopting a charter form of government after January 1, 2008, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general
reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to
result from such an increase, either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address;
every such increase in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by
the county board of equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the
notice to the landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the county
shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
3. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
4 and 5 of this section from the [state tax] commission, for any county not subject to the
provisions of subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any
assessor shall increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the
record owner on or before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase
either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address and include in such notice a
statement indicating that the change in assessed value may impact the record owner's tax
liability and provide all processes and deadlines for appealing determinations of the assessed
value of such property. Such notice shall be provided in a font and format sufficient to alert a
record owner of the potential impact upon tax liability and the appellate processes available.
4. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 5 of this
section from the [state tax] commission, for all counties not subject to the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section or subsection 2 of section 137.355, whenever any assessor shall
increase the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner
on or before June fifteenth of such increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county
shall notify the record owner of the projected tax liability likely to result from such an
increase, either in person, or by mail directed to the last known address; every such increase
in assessed valuation made by the assessor shall be subject to review by the county board of
equalization whereat the landowner shall be entitled to be heard, and the notice to the
landowner shall so state. Notice of the projected tax liability from the county shall
accompany the notice of increased valuation from the assessor.
5. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsections 2 and 4 of this
section, from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;

HB 2626 33
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.
6. In addition to the requirements provided under subsections 1, 2, and 5 of this
section, effective January 1, 2011, in any county with a charter form of government and with
more than one million inhabitants, whenever any assessor shall notify a record owner of any
change in assessed value, such assessor shall provide notice that information regarding the
assessment method and computation of value for such property is available on the assessor's
website and provide the exact website address at which such information may be accessed.
Such notification shall provide the assessor's contact information to enable taxpayers without
internet access to request and receive information regarding the assessment method and
computation of value for such property.
137.235. In preparing said assessor's book, each county assessor shall provide therein
three columns for values. The first to contain the total assessed valuation of tangible personal
property assessed to each individual, and the assessed valuation of each tract of land or town
lot listed; the second column to contain the valuation of such property as corrected and
equalized by the county board; and upon the receipt of a certificate from the state [tax]
assessment commission setting forth the action of said commission in respect to his or her
county, the county clerk shall extend in the third column the valuation as equalized and
assessed by said [state tax] commission. In all cases of extension where the equalized
valuation shall happen to be fractional, the clerk shall reject all such fractions as may fall
below fifty cents; fractions of fifty cents or more shall be extended as one dollar. The state,
county and all other taxes shall be computed and extended by the county clerk in separate
columns against the valuation produced by the equalization of the several classes of property
by the [state tax] commission; provided, that only one column shall be used for the total state
taxes, and one column for the total county taxes, such columns to be headed with the total tax

HB 2626 34
rate for such purposes, except that the county road tax may be extended in a separate column.
In the extension of taxes the fraction of a cent shall be extended as one cent. The county clerk
shall add up the figures showing the amount of such tax, in the proper columns, and the
aggregate amount in each column shall be noted on each page. Said clerk shall test the
accuracy of such additions by computing the amount of such tax on the aggregate amount of
property on each page, that he or she may be certain that the tax has been correctly extended
and added.
137.237. The county assessor of each county and the assessor of any city not within a
county shall, beginning January 1, 1989, and every odd-numbered year thereafter, identify,
list, and state the true value in money of the property in such county or city not within a
county which is totally or partially exempt from ad valorem taxes for such [taxable] tax year
pursuant to sections 99.800 to 99.865; sections 135.200 to 135.255; and section 353.110.
Such properties shall be identified and listed, with the true value in money of the property
included as well as the number of years of abatement remaining and the percentage of true
value exempted for the abated properties, in a report filed with the [state tax] commission and
the assessor of the county or city not within a county on or before November 1, 1989, and
November first of every odd-numbered year thereafter. Such report, in summary form, shall
be included in each reassessment notice stating said tax abatements in each county or city not
within a county and, in addition, include a statement that a list of specific abated property is
available for inspection upon request at the county courthouse or city hall of any city not
within a county.
137.243. 1. To determine the "projected tax liability" required by subsections 2 and 4
of section 137.180, subsection 3 of section 137.355, and subsection 2 of section 137.490, the
assessor, on or before March first of each odd-numbered tax year, shall provide the clerk with
the assessment book which for this purpose shall contain the real estate values for that year,
the prior year's state assessed values, and the prior year's personal property values. On or
before March fifteenth, the clerk shall make out an abstract of the assessment book showing
the aggregate amounts of different kinds of real, personal, and other tangible property and the
valuations of each for each political subdivision in the county, or in the city for any city not
within a county, entitled to levy ad valorem taxes on property except for municipalities
maintaining their own tax or assessment books. The governing body of each political
subdivision or a person designated by the governing body shall use such information to
informally project a nonbinding tax levy for that year and return such projected tax levy to the
clerk no later than April eighth. The clerk shall forward such information to the collector who
shall then calculate and, no later than April thirtieth, provide to the assessor the projected tax
liability for each real estate parcel for which the assessor intends to mail a notice of increase
pursuant to sections 137.180, 137.355, and 137.490.

HB 2626 35
2. Political subdivisions located at least partially within two or more counties, which
are subject to divergent time requirements, shall comply with all requirements applicable to
each such county and may utilize the most recent available information to satisfy such
requirements.
3. Failure by an assessor to timely provide the assessment book or notice of increased
assessed value, as provided in this section, may result in the [state tax] commission
withholding all or a part of the moneys provided under section 137.720 and all state per-
parcel reimbursement funds which would otherwise be made available to such assessor.
4. Failure by a political subdivision to provide the clerk with a projected tax levy in
the time prescribed under this section shall result in a twenty percent reduction in such
political subdivision's tax rate for the tax year, unless such failure is a direct result of a
delinquency in the provision of, or failure to provide, information required by this section by
the assessor or the clerk. If a political subdivision fails to provide the projected tax rate as
provided in this section, the clerk shall notify the state auditor who shall, within seven days of
receiving such notice, estimate a nonbinding tax levy for such political subdivision and return
such to the clerk. The clerk shall notify the state auditor of any applicable reduction to a
political subdivision's tax rate.
5. Any taxing district wholly within a county with a township form of government
may, through a request submitted by the county clerk, request that the state auditor's office
estimate a nonbinding projected tax rate based on the information provided by the county
clerk. The auditor's office shall return the projected tax rate to the county clerk no later than
April eighth.
6. The clerk shall deliver the abstract of the assessment book to each taxing district
with a notice stating that their projected tax rates be returned to the clerk by April eighth.
137.245. 1. The assessor shall make out and return to the county governing body, on
or before the first day of July in every year, the assessor's book, verified by an affidavit
annexed thereto, in the following words:
"______ being duly sworn, makes oath and says that such person has made diligent
efforts to ascertain all the taxable property being or situate, on the first day of January last
past, in the county of which such person is assessor; that, so far as such person has been able
to ascertain the same, it is correctly set forth in the foregoing book, in the manner and the
value thereof stated therein, according to the mode required by law".
2. The clerk of the county governing body shall immediately make out an abstract of
the assessment book, showing aggregate footings of the different columns, so as to set forth
the aggregate amounts of the different kinds of real and tangible personal property and the
valuation thereof, and forward the abstract to the [state tax] commission. Failure of the clerk

HB 2626 36
to make out and forward the abstract to the [state tax] commission on or before the twentieth
day of July is a misdemeanor.
3. The clerk of the county governing body in all counties, and the assessor in St.
Louis City, shall make out an abstract of the assessment book showing the aggregate amounts
of different kinds of real, personal and other tangible property and the valuations of each for
each political subdivision in the county entitled to levy ad valorem taxes on property except
for municipalities maintaining their own tax or assessment books. The clerk of each county,
and the assessor in St. Louis City, shall forward a copy of the aggregate valuation listed in the
tax book for each political subdivision, except counties and municipalities maintaining their
own tax or assessment books, to the governing body of the subdivision by the twentieth day
of July of each year. In any county which contains a city with a population of one hundred
thousand or more inhabitants which is located within a county of the first classification that
adjoins no other county of the first classification, the clerk of the county shall provide the
final revised assessed valuation listed in the tax book for each school district within the
county to each such district on or before the fifteenth day of August of each year. The clerk
of any county of the first classification with a charter form of government and with more than
six hundred thousand but less than seven hundred thousand inhabitants shall forward a copy
of the aggregate valuation listed in the tax book for school districts within the county to each
such district by the fifteenth day of July of each year.
137.295. When the books or lists for the collectors are completed, the county clerks
shall make a complete statement of the assessment and taxes charged, on blanks and in
conformity to instructions furnished by the director of revenue. The collector shall subscribe
a receipt for the tax book on the statement. The clerk shall record the statement and forward it
to the director of revenue, and forward a copy thereof to the [state tax] commission.
137.300. If, for any cause, there has been a failure to levy the state, county, school or
other taxes, or any portion thereof, or to extend and authenticate the taxes for the use of the
collector, or to deliver to the collector a proper tax book for the collection of the taxes, as
required by law, in any county for any year or years, the clerk of the county commission of
the county for the time being, when so required for the state taxes by the state [tax]
assessment commission, and for the county, school or other taxes by the county commission,
shall make a supplemental tax book for the year or years. The supplemental tax book shall be
made upon the assessments for the year or years for which the taxes should have been levied,
or if there has been a failure to assess the property, upon the assessment made as required by
section 137.175. The taxes for each year shall be in a separate book and shall be levied for
the state, county, school and other taxes, or portions of the taxes that were not levied and
collected at the proper time. In making the supplemental tax book, and in all subsequent
proceedings thereon, the county commission, clerk of the county commission and the

HB 2626 37
collector shall be governed by the law in force for the same duties, and shall receive the
compensation that is provided by law for similar duties. If the taxes or any portion of them
have been paid upon defective or illegal tax books, the amounts so paid shall not be charged
in the supplemental tax books, and if the taxes have been paid in full upon any property, the
taxes, with the description of the property and the name of the owner thereof, shall be omitted
from the supplemental tax book.
137.335. The [state tax] commission shall design the necessary assessment blanks,
which shall contain a classification of all tangible personal property, and the blanks shall be
furnished to the county assessor sixty days before January first of each year. After receiving
the form of the assessment blanks, the assessor or his or her deputies shall, between the first
day of January and the first day of July of each year, make and complete a list of all real and
tangible personal property taxable by the county and assess the property at its true value in
money.
137.345. 1. If any person, corporation, partnership or association neglects or refuses
to deliver an itemized statement or list of all the taxable tangible personal property signed and
certified by the taxpayer, as required by section 137.340, by the first day of March, the
taxpayer shall be assessed a penalty added to the tax bill, based on the assessed value of the
property that was not reported, as follows:
Assessed Valuation Penalty
0 - $1,000 $15.00
$1,001 - $2,000 $25.00
$2,001 - $3,000 $35.00
$3,001 - $4,000 $45.00
$4,001 - $5,000 $55.00
$5,001 - $6,000 $65.00
$6,001 - $7,000 $75.00
$7,001 - $8,000 $85.00
$8,001 - $9,000 $95.00
$9,001 and above $105.00

The assessor in any county of the first classification without a charter form of government
with a population of one hundred thousand or more inhabitants which contains all or part of a
city with a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants shall omit assessing
the penalty in any case where he or she is satisfied the neglect is unavoidable and not willful
or falls into one of the following categories. The assessor in all other political subdivisions

HB 2626 38
shall omit assessing the penalty in any case where he or she is satisfied the neglect falls into at
least one of the following categories:
(1) The taxpayer is in military service and is outside the state;
(2) The taxpayer filed timely, but in the wrong county;
(3) There was a loss of records due to fire, theft, fraud or flood;
(4) The taxpayer can show the list was mailed timely as evidenced by the date of
postmark;
(5) The assessor determines that no form for listing personal property was mailed to
the taxpayer for that tax year; or
(6) The neglect occurred as a direct result of the actions or inactions of the county or
its employees or contractors.
2. It shall be the duty of the county commission and assessor to place on the
assessment rolls for the year all property discovered in the calendar year which was taxable
on January first of that year.
3. Between March first and April first, the assessor shall send to each taxpayer who
was sent an assessment list for the current tax year, and said list was not returned to the
assessor, a second notice that statutes require that the assessment list be returned immediately.
In the event the taxpayer returns the assessment list to the assessor before May first, the
penalty described in subsection 1 of this section shall not apply. If said assessment list is not
returned before May first by the taxpayer, the penalty shall apply.
4. [The assessor, in the absence of the owner failing] If the owner fails to deliver a
required list of property, the assessoris not required to furnish to the owner a duplicate of the
assessment as made.
5. In every instance where a taxpayer has appealed to the board of equalization or the
[state tax] commission the assessment of the taxpayer's property, real or personal, and that
appeal has been successful, then in the next following and all subsequent years the basis upon
which the assessor must base future assessments of the subject property shall be the basis
established by the successful appeal and any increases must be established from that basis.
137.355. 1. If an assessor increases the valuation of any tangible personal property as
estimated in the itemized list furnished to the assessor, and if an assessor increases the
valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner of the
increase either in person or by mail directed to the last known address, and if the address of
the owner is unknown notice shall be given by publication in two newspapers published in the
county.
2. For all calendar years prior to the first day of January of the year following receipt
of software necessary for the implementation of the requirements provided under subsections
3 and 4 of this section from the [state tax] commission, whenever any assessor shall increase

HB 2626 39
the valuation of any real property, he or she shall forthwith notify the record owner on or
before June fifteenth of the previous assessed value and such increase either in person, or by
mail directed to the last known address and include on the face of such notice, in no less than
twelve-point font, the following statement:
NOTICE TO TAXPAYER: IF YOUR ASSESSED VALUE HAS INCREASED, IT
MAY INCREASE YOUR REAL PROPERTY TAXES WHICH ARE DUE DECEMBER
THIRTY-FIRST. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE THAT THE VALUE OF YOUR PROPERTY
HAS INCREASED, YOU MUST CHALLENGE THE VALUE ON OR BEFORE ______
(INSERT DATE BY WHICH APPEAL MUST BE FILED) BY CONTACTING YOUR
COUNTY ASSESSOR.
3. Effective January first of the year following receipt of software necessary for the
implementation of the requirements provided under this subsection and subsection 4 of this
section from the [state tax] commission, if an assessor increases the valuation of any real
property, the assessor, on or before June fifteenth, shall notify the record owner of the
increase and, in a year of general reassessment, the county shall notify the record owner of the
projected tax liability likely to result from such an increase either in person or by mail
directed to the last known address, and, if the address of the owner is unknown, notice shall
be given by publication in two newspapers published in the county. Notice of the projected
tax liability from the county shall accompany the notice of increased valuation from the
assessor.
4. The notice of projected tax liability, required under subsection 3 of this section,
from the county shall include:
(1) The record owner's name, address, and the parcel number of the property;
(2) A list of all political subdivisions levying a tax upon the property of the record
owner;
(3) The projected tax rate for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner, and the purpose for each levy of such political subdivisions;
(4) The previous year's tax rates for each individual tax levy imposed by each
political subdivision levying a tax upon the property of the record owner;
(5) The tax rate ceiling for each levy imposed by each political subdivision levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner;
(6) The contact information for each political subdivision levying a tax upon the
property of the record owner;
(7) A statement identifying any projected tax rates for political subdivisions levying a
tax upon the property of the record owner, which were not calculated and provided by the
political subdivision levying the tax; and
(8) The total projected property tax liability of the taxpayer.

HB 2626 40
137.375. 1. The assessor shall make out and return to the county commission, on or
before the first day of July in every year, the assessor's book, verified by his or her affidavit
annexed thereto, in the following words:
______ being duly sworn makes oath and says that he or shehas made diligent efforts
to ascertain all the taxable property being or situate on the first day of January last past, in the
county of which he or she is assessor; that, so far as he or she has been able to ascertain the
same, it is correctly set forth in the foregoing book, in the manner and the value thereof stated
therein, according to the mode required by law.
2. The clerk of the county commission shall immediately make out an abstract of the
assessment book, showing aggregate footings of the different columns, so as to set forth the
aggregate amounts of the different kinds of real and tangible personal property and the
valuation thereof, and forward the abstract to the state [tax] assessment commission.
3. Upon failure to make out and forward the abstract to the state [tax] assessment
commission on or before the twentieth day of July or within the additional time allowed by
the county commission, the clerk shall upon conviction be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.
137.405. The provisions of sections 137.325 to 137.420 shall not apply to property,
the assessment of which by the [state tax] commission is otherwise provided for by law.
137.465. 1. It shall be the duty of the county clerk of each county in this state, that
has or hereafter may adopt township organization, to annually submit, for the use of the
collector-treasurer of each county, correct lists of the property assessed, which lists shall be in
alphabetical order, the names of the persons owing tax on personal property in the county, the
aggregate value of such property assessed to each person, and the amount of taxes due
thereon.
2. The county clerk shall also submit for the use of the collector-treasurer an abstract
of all real property which is assessed, in numerical order, which shall show the name or
names, if known, of the person or persons to whom each tract or lot is assessed, and the value
of each tract or lot, and the amount of taxes due thereon, which list shall be made out in strict
conformity with the forms and instructions furnished by the [state tax] commission.
137.480. It shall be the duty of the [state tax] commission to make out and forward to
the county clerks of the several counties that have or may hereafter adopt township
organizations for the use of such county clerks and other officers, suitable forms and
instructions relating to the discharge of their duties; and all such instruction shall be strictly
complied with by said officers; it shall give its opinion and advice on all questions of doubt as
to the true intent and meaning of the law pertaining to township organization.
137.515. After the assessment plat books or records have been corrected, the assessor
shall make an abstract thereof showing the amount of the several kinds of property assessed
and specifying the amount of value of all taxable property within the city, and certify thereon

HB 2626 41
that the same is a true and correct abstract of all such property in the city so far as he or she
has been able to ascertain. One copy of the abstract, verified by his or her oath, shall be
delivered on or before the twentieth day of July to the mayor, and another to the [state tax]
commission.
137.720. 1. A percentage of all ad valorem property tax collections allocable to each
taxing authority within the county and the county shall be deducted from the collections of
taxes each year and shall be deposited into the assessment fund of the county as required
pursuant to section 137.750. The percentage shall be one-half of one percent for all counties
of the first and second classification and cities not within a county and one percent for
counties of the third and fourth classification.
2. Prior to July 1, 2009, for counties of the first classification, counties with a charter
form of government, and any city not within a county, an additional one-eighth of one percent
of all ad valorem property tax collections shall be deducted from the collections of taxes each
year and shall be deposited into the assessment fund of the county as required pursuant to
section 137.750, and for counties of the second, third, and fourth classification, an additional
one-quarter of one percent of all ad valorem property tax collections shall be deducted from
the collections of taxes each year and shall be deposited into the assessment fund of the
county as required pursuant to section 137.750, provided that such additional amounts shall
not exceed one hundred thousand dollars in any year for any county of the first classification
and any county with a charter form of government and fifty thousand dollars in any year for
any county of the second, third, or fourth classification.
3. Effective July 1, 2009, for counties of the first classification, counties with a
charter form of government, and any city not within a county, an additional one-eighth of one
percent of all ad valorem property tax collections shall be deducted from the collections of
taxes each year and shall be deposited into the assessment fund of the county as required
pursuant to section 137.750, and for counties of the second, third, and fourth classification, an
additional one-half of one percent of all ad valorem property tax collections shall be deducted
from the collections of taxes each year and shall be deposited into the assessment fund of the
county as required pursuant to section 137.750, provided that such additional amounts shall
not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars in any year for any county of the first
classification and any county with a charter form of government and seventy-five thousand
dollars in any year for any county of the second, third, or fourth classification.
4. The county shall bill any taxing authority collecting its own taxes. The county may
also provide additional moneys for the fund. To be eligible for state cost-share funds
provided pursuant to section 137.750, every county shall provide from the county general
revenue fund an amount equal to an average of the three most recent years of the amount
provided from general revenue to the assessment fund; provided, however, that capital

HB 2626 42
expenditures and equipment expenses identified in a memorandum of understanding signed
by the county's governing body and the county assessor prior to transfer of county general
revenue funds to the assessment fund shall be deducted from a year's contribution before
computing the three-year average, except that a lesser amount shall be acceptable if
unanimously agreed upon by the county assessor, the county governing body, and the state
[tax] assessment commission. The county shall deposit the county general revenue funds in
the assessment fund as agreed to in its original or amended maintenance plan[,]. State
reimbursement funds shall be withheld until the amount due is properly deposited in such
fund.
5. For all years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, any property tax collections
deposited into the county assessment funds provided for in subsection 2 of this section shall
be disallowed in any year in which the state [tax] assessment commission notifies the county
that state assessment reimbursement funds have been withheld from the county for three
consecutive quarters due to noncompliance by the assessor or county commission with the
county's assessment maintenance plan.
137.750. 1. If a county has an assessment maintenance plan approved pursuant to
section 137.115, a portion of all the costs and expenses of the assessor of each county and
each city not within a county, incurred for the current quarter in performing all duties
necessary to assess and maintain equalized assessed valuations of real property, making real
and personal property assessments and preparing abstracts of assessment lists, shall be
reimbursed by the state. The state shall reimburse up to sixty percent of all the current and
past unreported quarterly costs and expenses of the assessor of each county and each city not
within a county based on compliance with the [state tax] commission approved assessment
and equalization maintenance plan. The state shall reimburse each eligible county a
minimum of three dollars per parcel for up to twenty thousand parcels, but no further
reimbursements shall be made until the county has expended at least two-thirds of that
amount of money for assessment maintenance from its assessment fund. The annual state
reimbursement to any county pursuant to this section in 2000 shall not exceed seven dollars
per parcel of real property in the county and each year thereafter such maximum amount may
be increased by up to three percent, but the amount reimbursed by the state shall not exceed
sixty percent of the actual costs and expenses incurred, except that counties entitled to only
the three-dollar per parcel minimum shall receive one-fourth of the state's contribution each
quarter.
2. The governing body of each county and city not within a county which seeks or
will seek reimbursement under any provision of this section or section 137.720 shall establish
a fund to be known as the "Assessment Fund", to be used solely as a depository for funds
received by the county or city pursuant to this section and sections 137.037 and 137.720, from

HB 2626 43
the general revenue fund of the county or other sources for the purpose of funding the costs
and expenses incurred in implementing an assessment and equalization maintenance plan
approved under section 137.115 and for assessing real and personal property.
3. All counties and cities not within a county seeking state funds under this section
shall submit a certified copy of their costs and expenses to the commissioner of the office of
administration not later than the thirtieth day of the quarter immediately following the quarter
for which such state funds are sought. The commissioner of the office of administration shall,
in such form as may be prescribed by rule, certify that the county requests for reimbursement
are consistent with the assessment and equalization maintenance plan approved by the [state
tax] commission as provided in section 137.115, and shall pay the state's share out of funds
appropriated for that purpose quarterly to each eligible county and city to reimburse such
county or city for reimbursable costs and expenses incurred in the previous calendar quarter.
4. (1) The following costs and expenses shall not qualify for state reimbursement or
reimbursement from tax moneys withheld from political subdivisions:
(a) Premiums for property and casualty insurance and liability insurance;
(b) Depreciation, interest, building and ground maintenance, fuel and utility costs,
and other indirect expenses which can be classified as the overhead expenses of the assessor's
office;
(c) Purchases of motor vehicles;
(2) Costs and expenses which shall qualify for state reimbursement, but only if
identified in the county maintenance plan and subsequently specifically approved by the
[state tax] commission, shall include:
(a) Salaries and benefits of data processing and legal personnel not directly employed
by the assessor;
(b) Costs and expenses for computer software, hardware, and maintenance;
(c) Costs and expenses of any additional office space made necessary in order to carry
out the county's maintenance plan;
(d) Costs of leased equipment;
(e) Costs of aerial photography.
137.930. Any person, partnership, association, or corporation making claim to no-
situs status on any property under sections 137.900 to 137.960 shall do so in the form and
manner prescribed by the [state tax] commission. All such claims shall be accompanied by a
certification of the warehouseman or owner as to the status on its books of the property
involved.
137.940. If any in-transit property is reconsigned to a final destination in the state of
Missouri, the owner or his or heragent shall file a monthly report with the county assessor of
the county in which the warehouse is located, in the form and manner prescribed by the [state

HB 2626 44
tax] commission. All property so reconsigned which was owned or held on the first day of
January shall be assessed and taxed.
137.985. The [state tax] commission shall apportion the aggregate value of all
distributable property of such private car companies, except such valuations as are found to
be de minimis, to each county, showing the valuation apportioned for taxation by each
political subdivision in the county authorized to levy ad valorem property taxes. Such
apportionment shall be determined by the proportion of main line miles of track in each
county to the total mileage of main line track in the state of each of the railroad or street
railway companies which have transported railroad cars in behalf of such private car company
in the prior year. Valuation apportioned for taxation in behalf of school districts shall be the
same as that apportioned for each county, and such valuation shall be taxed using an average
school tax rate in each county in the manner provided in chapter 151 with the resulting
revenues distributed as provided in chapter 151.
137.1003. As used in sections 137.1000 to 137.1030, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the state [tax] assessment commission, or its successor entity;
(2) "Director", the director of revenue;
(3) "Distributable property", all property which is used directly in the movement of
passengers and freight, including railroad cars, but not property used as a collateral facility
nor property held for purposes other than rail transportation;
(4) "Freight line company", any person, association, company or corporation, not
being the owner or lessee of a railroad or street railway company, engaged in the business of
furnishing or leasing any railroad cars except dining, buffet, chair, parlor, or sleeping cars,
which are used in the operation of any railroad or street railway company wholly or partly
within the state, or when owning and operating, or operating, any railroad freight, refrigerator
or tank car on railway lines in this state for the transportation of his, her, or its goods, wares,
merchandise or products.
137.1018. 1. The commission shall ascertain the statewide average rate of property
taxes levied the preceding year, based upon the total assessed valuation of the railroad and
street railway companies and the total property taxes levied upon the railroad and street
railway companies. It shall determine total property taxes levied from reports prescribed by
the commission from the railroad and street railway companies. Total taxes levied shall not
include revenues from the surtax on subclass three real property.
2. The commission shall report its determination of average property tax rate for the
preceding year, together with the taxable distributable assessed valuation of each freight line
company for the current year to the director no later than October first of each year.
3. Taxes on property of such freight line companies shall be collected at the state level
by the director on behalf of the counties and other local public taxing entities and shall be

HB 2626 45
distributed in accordance with sections 137.1021 and 137.1024. The director shall tax such
property based upon the distributable assessed valuation attributable to Missouri of each
freight line company, using the average tax rate for the preceding year of the railroad and
street railway companies certified by the commission. Such tax shall be due and payable on
or before December thirty-first of the year levied and, if it becomes delinquent, shall be
subject to a penalty equal to that specified in section 140.100.
4. (1) As used in this subsection, the following terms mean:
(a) "Eligible expenses", expenses incurred in this state to manufacture, maintain, or
improve a freight line company's qualified rolling stock;
(b) "Qualified rolling stock", any freight, stock, refrigerator, or other railcars subject
to the tax levied under this section.
(2) For all [taxable] tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, a freight line
company shall, subject to appropriation, be allowed a credit against the tax levied under this
section for the applicable tax year. The tax credit amount shall be equal to the amount of
eligible expenses incurred during the calendar year immediately preceding the tax year for
which the credit under this section is claimed. The amount of the tax credit issued shall not
exceed the freight line company's liability for the tax levied under this section for the tax year
for which the credit is claimed.
(3) A freight line company may apply for the credit by submitting to the commission
an application in the form prescribed by the [state tax] commission.
(4) Subject to appropriation, the state shall reimburse, on an annual basis, any
political subdivision of this state for any decrease in revenue due to the provisions of this
subsection.
5. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The program authorized under subsection 4 of this section shall expire on August
28, 2028; and
(2) Subsection 4 of this section shall terminate on September 1, 2029.
138.030. 1. The members of the county board of equalization shall each take an oath,
to be administered by the clerk, to fairly and impartially equalize the valuation of all real
estate and tangible personal property taxable by the county.
2. The board shall hear complaints and equalize the valuation and assessments upon
all real and tangible personal property taxable by the county so that all the property shall be
entered on the tax book at its true value. The board shall not reduce the valuation of the real
or tangible personal property below the value thereof as fixed by the [state tax] commission.
138.060. 1. The county board of equalization shall, in a summary way, determine all
appeals from the valuation of property made by the assessor, and shall correct and adjust the
assessment accordingly. There shall be no presumption that the assessor's valuation is

HB 2626 46
correct. In any county with a charter form of government with a population greater than two
hundred eighty thousand inhabitants but less than two hundred eighty-five thousand
inhabitants, in any county with a charter form of government with greater than one million
inhabitants, in any city not within a county, and in any other county for any property whose
assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent from the previous assessment unless the
increase is due to new construction or improvement, the assessor shall have the burden to
prove that the assessor's valuation does not exceed the true market value of the subject
property. In such county or city, in the event a physical inspection of the subject property is
required by subsection 10 of section 137.115, the assessor shall have the burden to establish
the manner in which the physical inspection was performed and shall have the burden to
prove that the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115. In such
county or city, in the event the assessor fails to provide sufficient evidence to establish that
the physical inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115, the property
owner shall prevail on the appeal as a matter of law. At any hearing before the [state tax]
commission or a court of competent jurisdiction of an appeal of assessment from a first class
charter county or a city not within a county, the assessor shall not advocate nor present
evidence advocating a valuation higher than that value finally determined by the assessor or
the value determined by the board of equalization, whichever is higher, for that assessment
period.
2. The county clerk shall keep an accurate record of the proceedings and orders of the
board, and the assessor shall correct all erroneous assessments, and the clerk shall adjust the
tax book according to the orders of such board and the orders of the [state tax] commission,
except that in adding or deducting such percent to each tract or parcel of real estate as
required by such board or [state tax] commission, he or she shall add or deduct in each case
any fractional sum of less than fifty cents, so that the value of any separate tract shall contain
no fractions of a dollar.
138.080. In case the report of equalization from the [state tax] commission be not
received before or during the session of the county board of equalization, then it shall be the
duty of the county clerk to adjust the tax books according to such report when received.
138.110. Complaints as to rulings of the county board of equalization in such counties
shall be filed according to law with the [state tax] commission not later than September
thirtieth of the year in which such ruling was made.
138.135. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the county
assessor of any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants shall not be a member of the county board of equalization.
2. In any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, when there is an order of the board of equalization or the [state tax]

HB 2626 47
commission, including a settlement order, relating to the assessment of property, the
assessment shall remain the same for the subsequent even-numbered year unless there has
been new construction or property improvements between January first of the odd-numbered
year and January first of the following even-numbered year.
3. In any county of the first classification with a population of at least nine hundred
thousand inhabitants, when a hearing is conducted by the board of equalization pursuant to
this chapter, if the property owner requests to be heard by a majority of the board of
equalization, and a majority of the board of equalization is not in attendance for any reason,
the position of the property owner shall prevail without further action.
138.180. Any person may appeal in writing to the board of equalization from the
assessment of his or her property, which appeal shall specify the matter of which he or she
complains and which shall be filed at the office of the assessor of the city on or before the
second Monday in July of each year, and any person so appealing shall have the right of
appeal from decisions of the local board to the [state tax] commission as provided by law.
There shall be no presumption that the assessor's valuation is correct.
138.190. 1. There is hereby created within the state department of revenue a
commission to be known and designated as the "State Tax Commission". Beginning on the
effective date of this section, the state tax commission shall be renamed the "State
Assessment Commission". The director of revenue shall have no supervision, authority or
control over such actions or decisions of the [state tax] commission as relates to its duties
prescribed by law. The [state tax] commission shall be composed of three members, chosen
from the two major political parties, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice
and consent of the senate, one of whom shall be designated [chairman] chair, and to hold
office for staggered terms of six years; provided, however, that of members first appointed,
one member shall be appointed for a term of two years, one member for a term of four years,
and one member for a term of six years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his or her
successor shall qualify.
2. As used in chapters 137, 151, 153, and 155 and this chapter, unless the context
clearly indicates otherwise, the terms "commission" or "state tax commission" shall
mean the state assessment commission, or its successor entity, as renamed under this
section.
3. All statutory references to the state tax commission in relation to the purposes
provided under this chapter shall mean the state assessment commission as renamed
under this section and references in the statutes to such entity after such renaming shall
continue to apply to the commission.
138.200. 1. Each commissioner shall be a qualified voter and taxpayer and resident
of the state for at least five years next preceding his or her appointment. At all times the

HB 2626 48
[state tax] commission shall be so constituted that not more than two members shall be of the
same political party.
2. In the event of a vacancy occurring while the general assembly is not in session,
the governor may appoint a temporary member of the commission to serve until such time as
a permanent appointment can be made with the advice and consent of the senate.
3. Each commissioner shall devote his or her full time and efforts to the discharge of
his or her duties and shall not accept any private employment of any kind or nature while
serving on the commission nor hold any other office under the laws of this state, or any city,
or county, or city and county, in this state, nor any office under the government of the United
States.
4. No commissioner or employee of the commission shall hold any position of profit,
engage in any occupation or business interfering with, or inconsistent with, his or her duties
as commissioner or employee. No person is eligible to appointment or shall hold the office of
commissioner, or be appointed by the commission, or hold any office or position under the
commission, who holds any official office or position or who is a stockholder or who is in any
wise pecuniarily interested in any common carrier, public utility, or any other corporation
whose original assessment is made by the commission, as provided by this chapter. The
words "original assessment" as used herein shall not be held or construed to include the
assessment of corporation franchise tax.
138.210. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each commissioner
shall take and subscribe to the following oath:
State of Missouri, )
) -ss
County of ______ )
I, ______, do solemnly swear that I will support the Constitution of the
United States and the Constitution of [the state of ]Missouri; that I will
faithfully and impartially discharge my duties as a member of the state
[tax] assessment commission; and that I will according to my best
knowledge and judgment cause to be enforced all the laws of this state
pertaining to the duties of the state [tax] assessment commission, so
help me God.
_______________
Subscribed and sworn to this ______ day of ______ 20______
138.235. 1. The commission shall conduct seminars for its area supervisors and field
representatives, both in its office in Jefferson City and in various parts of the state, in order to
ascertain the best methods for the area supervisors and field representatives to use in their
work.

HB 2626 49
2. The commission shall investigate companies which have tangible personal
property for lease or companies which lease tangible personal property, to cause said property
to be properly taxed within this state.
3. For the additional duties imposed upon the members of the [tax] commission under
the provisions of this section, each member of the commission shall annually receive four
thousand dollars plus any salary adjustment provided pursuant to section 105.005.
138.250. The [state tax] commission and the members thereof shall be furnished with
appropriate quarters in Jefferson City, together with suitable equipment, furniture and
supplies.
138.290. 1. For the purpose of making any investigation, or the performance of other
duties with regard to any matters relating to taxation, the commission may appoint by an
order in writing an agent, or agents, whose duties shall be prescribed in the order.
2. Agents may be paid a salary, fee or commission in the discretion of the [state tax]
commission; if a salary, the amount paid shall be fixed by the commission within the limits of
the appropriations made therefor; if a fee or commission, the amount paid shall be in
accordance with the value of the service rendered, and must be agreed upon and approved by
the [state tax] commission before the agent renders service under his or her appointment.
3. Such claim shall be certified by the [state tax] commission and paid as provided by
law for other claims against the state.
4. Any expenditure authorized or incurred for payment of services rendered by any
agent in excess of amount appropriated for the purpose is hereby made chargeable to the
[state tax] commission and the commission with their bondsmen shall be held liable for any
such excess.
138.320. It shall be the duty of the [state tax] commission to make out and forward to
each county clerk, from time to time, for the use of such clerks and other officers, suitable
forms and instructions for carrying this chapter into effect; and all such instructions shall be
strictly complied with by the officers in the performance of their respective duties, as required
by this chapter. The [state tax] commission shall give its opinion and advice on all questions
of doubt as to the true intent and meaning of the provisions of this chapter.
138.330. 1. The commission shall have an official seal with the words ["State Tax
Commission"] "State Assessment Commission" arranged in a circle outside the seal of the
state.
2. All process or certificates issued or given by the commission shall be attested by
said seal.
3. Copies of the record of the commission certified by the secretary and attested with
the seal of the commission shall be received in evidence with a like effect as copies of other
public records.

HB 2626 50
4. The secretary of the commission shall be the custodian of the seal and records and
be authorized to affix the seal in all proper cases.
138.380. It shall be the duty of the [state tax] commission, and the commissioners
shall have authority, to perform all duties enumerated in this section and such other duties as
may be provided by law:
(1) To raise or lower the assessed valuation of any real or tangible personal property,
including the power to raise or lower the assessed valuation of the real or tangible personal
property of any individual, copartnership, company, association or corporation; provided, that
before any such assessment is so raised, notice of the intention of the commission to raise
such assessed valuation and of the time and place at which a hearing thereon will be held,
shall be given to such individual, copartnership, company, association or corporation as
provided in sections 138.460 and 138.470;
(2) To require from any officer in this state, on forms prescribed by the commission,
such annual or other reports as shall enable said commission to ascertain the assessed and
equalized value of all real and tangible property listed for taxation, the amount of taxes
assessed, collected and returned, and such other matter as the commission may require, to the
end that it may have complete information concerning the entire subject of revenue and
taxation and all matters and things incidental thereto;
(3) To cause to be placed upon the assessment rolls at any time during the year
omitted property which may be discovered to have, for any reason, escaped assessment and
taxation, and to correct any errors that may be found on the assessment rolls and to cause the
proper entry to be made thereon;
(4) To investigate the tax laws of other states and countries, to formulate and submit
to the legislature such recommendations as the commission may deem expedient to prevent
evasions of the assessment and taxing laws, whether the tax is specific or general, to secure
just, equal and uniform taxes, and improve the system of assessment and taxation in this state;
(5) To prescribe the form of all blanks and books that are used in the assessment and
collection of the general property tax, except as otherwise provided by law; and
(6) To develop, or enter into contracts with entities for the development of, computer
software programs sufficient to produce the projected tax liability notices required under
subsections 2 and 3 of section 137.180, subsection 2 of section 137.355, and subsection 2 of
section 137.490. Upon receiving a request, before December 31, 2009, filed by a collector of
any county or any city not within the county, the commission shall provide the collector with
such computer software programs.
138.390. 1. The [state tax] commission shall equalize the valuation of real and
tangible personal property among the several counties in the state in the following manner:
with the abstracts of all the taxable property in the several counties of the state and the

HB 2626 51
abstracts of the sales of real estate in such counties as returned by the respective county clerks
and the assessor of the city of St. Louis, the commission shall classify all real estate situate in
cities, towns, and villages, as town lots, and all other real estate as farming lands, and shall
classify all tangible personal property as follows: banking corporations, railroad
corporations, street railroad corporations, all other corporations, horses, mares and
geldings, mules, asses and jennets, neat cattle, sheep, swine, goats, domesticated small
animals and all other livestock, poultry, power machinery, farm implements, other tangible
personal property.
2. The [state tax] commission shall equalize the valuation of each class or subclass of
property thereof among the respective counties of the state in the following manner:
(1) It shall add to the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof of the
property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued below its real
value in money such amount or percent as will increase the same in each case to its true value;
(2) It shall deduct from the valuation of each class, subclass, or portion thereof of the
property, real or tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be valued above its real
value in money such amount or percent as will reduce the same in each case to its true value.
138.400. 1. The secretary of the [state tax] commission shall certify to each county
clerk and to the assessor in the city of St. Louis the aggregate values of property in the several
counties within fourteen days of the receipt of the abstracts from the county clerk.
2. It shall be the duty of the [state tax] commission to require of clerks of the several
county commissions of this state and of the assessor in St. Louis City to keep up the
aggregate valuation of real and tangible personal property in their respective counties as fixed
by the [state tax] commission, and to return such aggregate values to the [state tax]
commission upon the adjournment of the board of equalization. The clerks may amend the
aggregate values returned to the [state tax] commission at any time on or before December
thirty-first of the year of assessment.
3. In any case where the final valuation fixed by a county board of equalization, as
reported to the [state tax] commission, differs materially from the valuation fixed by the
commission, such county board of equalization may be called into session by order of the
[state tax] commission at any time between the date when such county board of equalization
adjourns sine die and the first day of November of the same year.
138.420. 1. The [state tax] commission shall have the exclusive power of original
assessment of the distributable property of railroads, railroad cars, rolling stock, street
railroads, bridges, telegraph, telephone, electric power and light companies, electric
transmission lines, pipeline companies, express companies, and other similar public utility
corporations, companies and firms, and of the aircraft of airlines companies in a manner not
inconsistent with chapter 155.

HB 2626 52
2. After original assessments of the [state tax] commission have been completed, each
corporation, person or public utility interested therein shall be promptly notified of the action
of the [state tax] commission and shall have the right to apply for a rehearing. The [state tax]
commission shall grant and hold such rehearing and fix the date thereof.
3. If, after such rehearing and a consideration of the facts, the [state tax] commission
shall be of the opinion that the original decision or any part thereof should be changed, the
[state tax] commission may change or modify the same and such assessed valuations as are
finally determined shall be certified to the clerks of the several county commissions and to the
assessor in St. Louis City at the same time that valuations of real and tangible personal
property are returned.
4. The [state tax] commission shall also have all power of original assessment of real
and tangible personal property in the possession of any assessing officer on January first.
138.430. 1. Every owner of real property or tangible personal property shall have the
right to appeal from the local boards of equalization to the [state tax] commission under rules
prescribed by the [state tax] commission, within the time prescribed in this chapter or thirty
days following the final action of the local board of equalization, whichever date later occurs,
concerning all questions and disputes involving the assessment against such property, the
correct valuation to be placed on such property, the method or formula used in determining
the valuation of such property, or the assignment of a discriminatory assessment to such
property. The commission shall investigate all such appeals and shall correct any assessment
or valuation which is shown to be unlawful, unfair, improper, arbitrary or capricious. Any
person aggrieved by the decision of the commission may seek review as provided in chapter
536.
2. In order to investigate such appeals, the commission may inquire of the owner of
the property or of any other party to the appeal regarding any matter or issue relevant to the
valuation, subclassification or assessment of the property. The commission may make its
decision regarding the assessment or valuation of the property based solely upon its inquiry
and any evidence presented by the parties to the commission, or based solely upon evidence
presented by the parties to the commission.
3. Every owner of real property or tangible personal property shall have the right to
appeal to the circuit court of the county in which the collector maintains his or her office
from the decision of the local board of equalization not later than thirty days after the final
decision of the board of equalization concerning all questions and disputes involving the
exclusion or exemption of such property from assessment or from the tax rolls pursuant to the
Constitution of the United States or the constitution or laws of this state, or of the taxable situs
of such property. The appeal shall be as a trial de novo in the manner prescribed for nonjury
civil proceedings. Upon the timely filing of the appeal, the clerk of the circuit court shall

HB 2626 53
send to the county collector to whom the taxes on the property involved would be due a notice
that an appeal seeking exemption has been filed, which notice shall contain the name of the
taxpayer, the case number assigned by the court, and the parcel or locator number of the
property being appealed. The notice to the collector shall state that the taxes in dispute are to
be impounded in accordance with subsection 2 of section 139.031.
4. Upon the timely filing of an appeal to the [state tax] commission as provided in this
section, or the transfer of an appeal to the commission in accordance with subsection 5 of this
section, the commission shall send to the county collector to whom the taxes on the property
involved would be due a notice that an appeal has been filed or transferred as the case may be,
which notice shall contain the name of the taxpayer filing the appeal, the appeal number
assigned by the commission, the parcel or locator number of the property being appealed, the
assessed value by the board of equalization and the assessed value proposed by the taxpayer,
if such values have been provided to the commission when the appeal is filed. The notice to
the collector shall state that the taxes in dispute are to be impounded in accordance with
subsection 2 of section 139.031. Notice to the collector of an appeal filed in an odd-
numbered year shall also serve as notice to the collector to impound taxes for the following
even-numbered year if no decision has been rendered in the appeal. The [state tax]
commission shall notify the collector once a decision has been rendered in an appeal.
5. If the circuit court, after review of the appeal, finds that the appeal is not a proper
subject for the appeal to the circuit court as provided in subsection 3 of this section, it shall
transfer the appeal to the [state tax] commission for consideration.
6. If an assessor classifies real property under a classification that is contrary to or in
conflict with a determination by the [state tax] commission or a court of competent
jurisdiction of said property, the taxpayer shall be awarded costs of appeal and reasonable
attorney's fees on a challenge of the assessor's determination.
138.433. In determining whether pleadings are filed within the time allowed by law,
such pleadings may be transmitted to the [state tax] commission by registered mail.
Pleadings so filed shall be deemed filed with the commission as of the date deposited with the
United States Postal Service as shown by the record of such mailing.
138.434. Any first class charter county or a city not within a county may require by
ordinance or charter the reimbursement to a taxpayer for the amount of just and reasonable
appraisal costs, attorney's fees and court costs resulting from an evidentiary hearing before
the [state tax] commission or a court of competent jurisdiction if such appeal results in a final
decision reducing the appraised value of residential property by at least fifteen percent or the
appraised value of utility, industrial railroad and other subclass three property by at least
twenty-five percent from the appraised value determined by the board of equalization for that
tax year. The commission or court awarding such fees and costs shall consider the

HB 2626 54
reasonableness of the fees and costs within the context of the particular case. Such fees and
costs shall not exceed one thousand dollars for a residential property appeal. Such fees and
costs for utility, industrial railroad or other subclass three property appeals shall not exceed
the lesser of four thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the tax savings resulting from the
appeal. The provisions of this section shall only apply to the first contested year when cases
are tried on a consolidated basis.
138.435. 1. There is hereby established within the [state tax] commission the "Office
of State Ombudsman for Property Assessment and Taxation" for the purpose of helping to
assure the fairness, accountability, and transparency of the property tax process.
2. The office shall be administered by the state ombudsman, who shall devote his or
her entire time to the duties of the position.
3. The office shall establish and implement procedures for receiving, processing,
responding to, and resolving complaints made by or on behalf of taxpayers relating to
assessments, valuation of property, tax levies of political subdivisions, and appeals before the
assessor, board of equalization, or the [state tax] commission.
4. The ombudsman or representatives of the office shall have the authority to:
(1) Investigate any complaints or inquiries that come to the attention of the office.
The ombudsman shall have access to review taxpayer records, if given permission by the
taxpayer or the taxpayer's legal guardian. Taxpayers shall have the right to request, deny, or
terminate any assistance that the ombudsman may provide;
(2) Make the necessary inquiries and review of such information and records as the
ombudsman or representative of the office deems necessary to accomplish the objective of
verifying these complaints.
5. The office shall acknowledge complaints, report its findings, make
recommendations, gather and disseminate information and other material, and publicize its
existence.
6. The ombudsman may recommend to the relevant state or local governmental
agency or political subdivision changes in the rules and regulations adopted or proposed by
such governmental agency or political subdivision which do or may adversely affect the
rights or privileges of taxpayers. The office shall analyze and monitor the development and
implementation of federal, state and local laws, regulations, and policies with respect to
property assessment and taxation, and shall recommend to the [state tax] commission changes
in such laws, regulations, and policies deemed by the office to be appropriate.
7. The office shall promote community contact and involvement with taxpayers
through the use of volunteers and volunteer programs to encourage citizen involvement in the
property tax process.

HB 2626 55
8. The office shall prepare and distribute to each county written notices which set
forth the address, telephone number, and email address of the office, a brief explanation of the
function of the office, the procedure to follow in filing a complaint, and other pertinent
information.
9. The county shall ensure that such written notice is available upon request of any
taxpayer.
10. The office shall inform taxpayers or their legal guardians of their rights and
entitlements by means of the distribution of educational materials and group meetings.
138.440. 1. A report of the proceedings and decisions of the [state tax] commission
shall be printed annually.
2. The report shall contain a complete account of the work of the [state tax]
commission, including its proceedings and decisions while acting as a board of equalization.
3. After the report has been prepared by the administrative secretary, the members of
the commission shall edit the report and make any corrections or revision necessary.
4. The commission shall also from time to time select and designate the works, papers
or studies of the [state tax] commission relating to the field of taxation that may in the
judgment of the commission be of interest to the public and cause same to be published in
pamphlet or booklet form.
5. For the additional duties imposed upon the members of the [tax] commission under
the provisions of this section each member of the commission shall annually receive six
thousand dollars plus any salary adjustment provided pursuant to section 105.005.
138.445. 1. The [state tax] commission [of Missouri] shall annually certify to the
director of revenue and to the commissioner of education a copy of its most recent annual
report containing the total valuation of all taxable properties in the state according to the
county or counties for which the same is assessed. The commission shall also certify to the
director and to the commissioner any amendments or modifications to the annual report;
provided, however, that no amendments or modifications to the annual report shall be
accepted by the [state tax] commission or certified by it to the director of revenue or the
commissioner of education at any time after December thirty-first of the year.
2. The annual report of the [state tax] commission and any amendments or
modifications thereto duly certified to the director of revenue and to the commissioner of
education shall constitute the official record of the state of Missouri for purposes of section
142.345 and section 163.011.
3. The reports certified pursuant to this section shall not be construed to represent the
assessment ratio or general assessment level of any county in this state.
4. For the additional duties imposed upon the members of the [tax] commission under
the provisions of this section, each member of the commission shall annually receive nine

HB 2626 56
thousand dollars plus any salary adjustment provided pursuant to section 105.005 payable in
equal monthly installments.
5. As a part of the report defined in this section, the [state tax] commission shall
include the difference in assessed value for any telephone company that, according to
subsection 5 of section 153.030, elects to be assessed utilizing the methodology [defined]
described in section 137.122. The commissioner of education shall transmit the information
to each school district.
138.470. 1. The commission, or any member thereof, or any duly authorized agent,
shall appear at the time and place mentioned in said order, and the assessing officer, upon
whom said notice shall have been served, shall also appear with said assessment roll. The
commission, or any member thereof, or any duly authorized agent thereof, as the case may be,
shall then and there hear and determine as to the proper assessment of all property and
persons mentioned in said notice, and all persons affected, or liable to be affected by review
of said assessments thus provided for, may appear and be heard at said hearing. In case said
commission, or any member or agent thereof who is acting in said review, shall determine that
the assessments so reviewed are not made according to law, the county clerk shall, in a
column provided for that purpose, place opposite said property the lawful valuation of the
same for assessment.
2. As to the property not upon the assessment roll, the county clerk, upon order of the
[state tax] commission, acting in said review, shall place the same upon said assessment roll
by proper description and shall place thereafter in the proper column the value required by
law for the assessment of said property. The county clerk, upon orders of the [state tax]
commission, shall also spread upon said roll a certificate showing the day and date on which
said assessment roll was reviewed by the commission.
3. For appearing with said roll as required herein the assessing officer shall receive
the same per diem as is received by him or her while in attendance at the meeting of the
county board of equalization. His or her claim shall be presented to and paid by the proper
officer of the political subdivision, or municipality, of which he or sheis the assessing officer,
in the manner as his or her other compensation is paid.
4. The action of the commission, or member or agent thereof, when done as provided
in this section, shall be final, subject, however, to review in the manner provided in sections
536.100 to 536.140, except that the venue of proceedings for review involving the assessment
of real property is in the county where the real property is situated.
5. When any property has been reviewed, assessed and valued by the commission as
herein authorized, such property shall not be assessed or valued at a lower figure or a higher
figure by the local assessing or equalizing officer for the year the assessment is made.

HB 2626 57
138.480. The [state tax] commission is hereby authorized to cause to be destroyed, by
burning, in the presence of the [state tax] commission, the papers herein designated, after a
period of five years after the filing thereof, to wit: All tax returns of all individuals, firms,
partnerships, and corporations; provided, that no such returns shall be burned as long as any
tax based thereon shall be in litigation, or unpaid.
139.031. 1. Any taxpayer may protest all or any part of any current taxes assessed
against the taxpayer, except taxes collected by the director of revenue of Missouri. Any such
taxpayer desiring to pay any current taxes under protest or while paying taxes based upon a
disputed assessment shall, at the time of paying such taxes, make full payment of the current
tax bill before the delinquency date and file with the collector a written statement setting forth
the grounds on which the protest is based. The statement shall include the true value in
money claimed by the taxpayer if disputed. An appeal before the state [tax] assessment
commission shall not be dismissed on the grounds that a taxpayer failed to file a written
statement when paying taxes based upon a disputed assessment.
2. Upon receiving payment of current taxes under protest under subsection 1 of this
section or upon receiving from the state [tax] assessment commission or the circuit court
notice of an appeal from the state [tax] assessment commission or the circuit court under
section 138.430, along with full payment of the current tax bill before the delinquency date,
the collector shall disburse to the proper official all portions of taxes not protested or not
disputed by the taxpayer and shall impound in a separate fund all portions of such taxes which
are protested or in dispute. Every taxpayer protesting the payment of current taxes under
subsection 1 of this section shall, within ninety days after filing his or her protest, commence
an action against the collector by filing a petition for the recovery of the amount protested in
the circuit court of the county in which the collector maintains his or her office. If any
taxpayer so protesting his or her taxes under subsection 1 of this section shall fail to
commence an action in the circuit court for the recovery of the taxes protested within the time
prescribed in this subsection, such protest shall become null and void and of no effect, and the
collector shall then disburse to the proper official the taxes impounded, and any interest
earned thereon, as provided above in this subsection.
3. No action against the collector shall be commenced by any taxpayer who has,
effective for the current tax year, filed with the state [tax] assessment commission or the
circuit court a timely and proper appeal of the assessment of the taxpayer's property. The
portion of taxes in dispute from an appeal of an assessment shall be impounded in a separate
fund and the commission in its decision and order issued under chapter 138 or the circuit
court in its judgment may order all or any part of such taxes refunded to the taxpayer, or may
authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any part of such taxes.

HB 2626 58
4. Trial of the action for recovery of taxes protested under subsection 1 of this section
in the circuit court shall be in the manner prescribed for nonjury civil proceedings, and, after
determination of the issues, the court shall make such orders as may be just and equitable to
refund to the taxpayer all or any part of the current taxes paid under protest, together with any
interest earned thereon, or to authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any part of
the impounded taxes, and any interest earned thereon, to the appropriate officials of the taxing
authorities. Either party to the proceedings may appeal the determination of the circuit court.
5. All the county collectors of taxes, and the collector of taxes in any city not within a
county, shall, upon written application of a taxpayer, refund or credit against the taxpayer's
tax liability in the following [taxable] taxyear and subsequent consecutive [taxable] taxyears
until the taxpayer has received credit in full for any real or personal property tax mistakenly
or erroneously levied against the taxpayer and collected in whole or in part by the collector.
Such application shall be filed within three years after the tax is mistakenly or erroneously
paid. The governing body, or other appropriate body or official of the county or city not
within a county, shall make available to the collector funds necessary to make refunds under
this subsection by issuing warrants upon the fund to which the mistaken or erroneous
payment has been credited, or otherwise.
6. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any money paid in by the taxpayer
erroneously.
7. All protested taxes impounded under protest under subsection 1 of this section and
all disputed taxes impounded under notice as required by section 138.430 shall be invested by
the collector in the same manner as assets specified in section 30.260 for investment of state
moneys. A taxpayer who is entitled to a refund of protested or disputed taxes shall also
receive the interest earned on the investment thereof. If the collector is ordered to release and
disburse all or part of the taxes paid under protest or dispute to the proper official, such taxes
shall be disbursed along with the proportional amount of interest earned on the investment of
the taxes due the particular taxing authority.
8. Any taxing authority may request to be notified by the county collector of current
taxes paid under protest. Such request shall be in writing and submitted on or before
February first next following the delinquent date of current taxes paid under protest or
disputed, and the county collector shall provide such information on or before March first of
the same year to the requesting taxing authority of the taxes paid under protest and disputed
taxes which would be received by such taxing authority if the funds were not the subject of a
protest or dispute. Any taxing authority may apply to the circuit court of the county or city
not within a county in which a collector has impounded protested or disputed taxes under this
section and, upon a satisfactory showing that such taxing authority would receive such
impounded tax funds if they were not the subject of a protest or dispute and that such taxing

HB 2626 59
authority has the financial ability and legal capacity to repay such impounded tax funds in the
event a decision ordering a refund to the taxpayer is subsequently made, the circuit court shall
order, pendente lite, the disbursal of all or any part of such impounded tax funds to such
taxing authority. The circuit court issuing an order under this subsection shall retain
jurisdiction of such matter for further proceedings, if any, to compel restitution of such tax
funds to the taxpayer. In the event that any protested or disputed tax funds refunded to a
taxpayer were disbursed to a taxing authority under this subsection instead of being held and
invested by the collector under subsection 7 of this section, the taxpayer shall be entitled to
interest on all refunded tax funds at the annual rate calculated by the state treasurer and
applied by the director of revenue under section 32.068. This measure of interest shall only
apply to protested or disputed tax funds actually distributed to a taxing authority pursuant to
this subsection. In the event of a refund of protested or disputed tax funds which remain
impounded by the collector, the taxpayer shall instead be entitled to the interest actually
earned on those refunded impounded tax funds under subsection 7 of this section. Any
sovereign or official immunity otherwise applicable to the taxing authorities is hereby waived
for all purposes related to this subsection, and the taxpayer is expressly authorized to seek an
order enforcing this provision from the circuit court that originally ordered the distribution of
the protested or disputed funds, or directly from the state [tax] assessment commission, if the
tax appeal that resulted in the refund was heard and determined by the state [tax] assessment
commission.
9. No appeal filed from the circuit court's or state [tax] assessment commission's
determination pertaining to the amount of refund shall stay any order of refund, but the
decision filed by any court of last review modifying that determination shall be binding on the
parties, and the decision rendered shall be complied with by the party affected by any
modification within ninety days of the date of such decision. No taxpayer shall receive any
interest on any additional award of refund, and the collector shall not receive any interest on
any ordered return of refund in whole or in part.
150.080. In all cities now having or which may hereafter have a population of one
hundred thousand or more, the license commissioner, collector, or other officer authorized to
take, file and receive the sworn statements and returns of all merchants as to their properties
for taxation, shall annually, under oath, on or before the first Monday in October in each year,
deliver to the state [tax] assessment commission a full and true statement to each, showing
the names of such merchants, alphabetically arranged, and opposite each name such officer
shall, in a separate column, give the total valuation of all merchandise and other properties
returned for taxation within such cities.
150.090. 1. In the city of St. Louis the duties in sections 150.050 to 150.070 required
to be performed by the county assessor, county clerk and collector, shall be performed by the

HB 2626 60
license collector of the city of St. Louis. Said license collector shall not receive any fees or
other compensation for such services than his or her salary as license collector.
2. The powers by sections 150.010 to 150.290 vested in, and the duties required to be
performed by the county board of equalization, shall be vested in and performed by a board of
merchants' and manufacturers' tax equalization, which shall consist of three discreet and
experienced real estate owners of said city, of a prior residence therein of ten years, who shall
be appointed by the mayor of said city annually in the month of May and shall meet at the
office of the license collector of said city on the second Monday in July in each and every
year, for the purpose of equalizing the valuation of merchants' statements. The time for the
meeting of said board to hear reasons, if any, why any increase made by the board should not
have been made shall be the second Monday in August. The length of time that said board
shall continue in session and the compensation to be paid the members of said board shall be
fixed by ordinance of said city.
3. The statements required by sections 150.010 to 150.290 to be furnished by
merchants shall be filed with the license collector of the city of St. Louis on or before the first
Monday in July, 1946, and on the same date each year thereafter. After final approval by the
board of the valuation of the property shown on a merchants' statement, the license collector
shall compute the tax due, prepare a tax bill and mail same to the taxpayer. Upon payment
thereof, the license collector shall issue a license therefor.
4. The license collector shall keep and prepare such books, records and reports as may
be required by law or as prescribed by the comptroller, except that in lieu of the report to the
state [tax] assessment commission required under section 150.080, the license collector may
furnish an abstract of his or her records showing the total valuation and the total collections
made. The provisions of sections 150.160 and 150.180 pertaining to the execution of a bond
by the merchant shall in the discretion of the license collector not be required in the city of St.
Louis.
5. It shall be the duty of any merchant commencing business after January first of any
year to file with the license collector a statement estimating the highest amount of goods,
wares and merchandise which he or she will have on hand or subject to his or her control,
whether owned by himself or herself or consigned to him or her for sale at any one time
prior to the first day of January next succeeding and to pay to the license collector a tax on a
prorated basis.
150.290. Any collector, license commissioner, or other officer in all cities now having
or which may hereafter have a population of one hundred thousand or more, who shall fail to
furnish the state [tax] assessment commission a statement as required in section 150.080,
shall, upon conviction thereof, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

HB 2626 61
150.350. 1. In the city of St. Louis the duties in sections 150.300 to 150.370 required
to be performed by the county assessor, county clerk and collector, shall be performed by the
license collector of the city of St. Louis.
2. The powers by sections 150.300 to 150.370 vested in, and the duties required to be
performed by the county board of equalization, shall be vested in and performed by a board of
merchants' and manufacturers' tax equalization, which shall consist of three discreet and
experienced real estate owners of the city of St. Louis, of a prior residence therein of ten
years, who shall be appointed by the mayor of such city annually in the month of May and
shall meet at the office of the license collector of the city of St. Louis on the second Monday
in July in each and every year, for the purpose of equalizing the valuation of manufacturers'
statements. The time for the meeting of the board of merchants' and manufacturers' tax
equalization to hear reasons, if any, why any increase made by the board should not have been
made shall be not sooner than five days after receipt of a raise notice. The length of time that
such board shall continue in session and the compensation to be paid the members of the
board shall be fixed by ordinance of the city of St. Louis.
3. The statements required by sections 150.300 to 150.370 to be furnished by
manufacturers shall be filed with the license collector of the city of St. Louis on or before July
first of each year. After final approval by the board of the valuation of the property shown on
a manufacturer's statement, the license collector shall compute the tax due, prepare a tax bill
and mail same to the taxpayer. Upon payment thereof, the license collector shall issue a
license therefor.
4. The license collector shall keep and prepare such books, records, and reports as
may be required by law or as prescribed by the comptroller, except that in lieu of the report to
the state [tax] assessment commission required under section 150.360, the license collector
may furnish an abstract of his or her records showing the total valuation and the total
collections made.
150.360. In all cities now having or which may hereafter have a population of one
hundred thousand or more, the license commissioner, collector, or other officer authorized to
take, file and receive the sworn statements and returns of all manufacturers as to their
properties for taxation, shall annually, under oath, on the first Monday of August of each year,
forward to the state [tax] assessment commission and to the governor, a full and true
statement to each, showing the names of such manufacturers alphabetically arranged and
opposite each name, such officer shall, in a separate column, give the total valuation of all
raw material, finished products, tools, machinery and appliances, and other property as
returned for taxation by the manufacturers of such cities.
150.370. Any license commissioner, collector or other officer mentioned in section
150.360, who shall fail or refuse to make annual statements to the state [tax] assessment

HB 2626 62
commission, as provided in section 150.360, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and
upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred nor more
than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
151.020. 1. (1) On or before the fifteenth day of April in each year, an authorized
officer of every railroad company whose road is so far completed and in operation as to run
locomotive engines, with freight or passenger cars thereon, shall furnish to the [state tax]
commission a report as of the first day of January, duly subscribed and sworn to by an
authorized officer before some officer authorized to administer oaths, setting out in detail the
total length of their road so far as completed, including branch or leased roads, the entire
length in this state, and the length of double or sidetracks, with the length of such road, double
or sidetracks, in each county, municipal township, city or incorporated town, special road
district, library district, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to
section 137.030, hospital districts organized under the hospital district law, nursing home
districts organized under the nursing home district law, ambulance districts, metropolitan
zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350, public water
supply, fire protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school districts,
through or in which it is located in this state; all the other distributable property of the railroad
and the true value in money thereof, and such information concerning itself and all of its
property, wherever situated, as the [state tax] commission may reasonably require for the
purpose of determining the true value in money of the distributable property of the railroad
company in this state and for apportioning the valuation for assessment of such property
among the various counties;
(2) The term "distributable property" of a railroad company shall include all property,
real and tangible personal, owned, used, leased or otherwise controlled by a railroad company
which is used directly in the movement of passengers and freight, but not property used as a
collateral facility nor property held for purposes other than those of a railroad. Such
distributable property includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Rail, ballast, ties, switches, and switching equipment;
(b) Roadbed, superstructure, bridges, trestles, and culverts;
(c) Railroad right-of-way, leased railroad lines, depots, water tanks and turntables;
(d) Rolling stock, engines, and handcars;
(e) Any other property used directly in the movement of passengers or freight;
(f) Communication equipment used for control of the movement of passengers and
freight;
(3) The term "local property" of a railroad company shall include all real and tangible
personal property owned, used, leased, or otherwise controlled by any railroad company and

HB 2626 63
not used directly in the movement of passengers and freight, not defined in subdivision (2) of
this subsection as distributable property. Such property includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Construction work in progress;
(b) Materials and supplies;
(c) Motor vehicles;
(d) Office furniture, office equipment, and office fixtures;
(e) Office buildings and warehouses;
(f) Roundhouses and workshops;
(g) Land and buildings not assessed as distributable property;
(h) Communication equipment not used for control of the movement of passengers
and freight.
2. All annual reports, and any addenda thereto, filed with the commission shall be
considered proprietary documents and shall be accessible only to the commission and its staff
for internal use only. Any person who violates the confidentiality requirement of this
subsection commits a class A misdemeanor and may be dismissed from their position of
employment by the [state tax] commission without possibility of reinstatement.
3. Upon written request by an authorized officer of any railroad company operating in
this state, the [state tax] commission may, for good cause shown, enlarge or extend the time
for filing an annual report and any addenda thereto. Such written request must be filed with
the [state tax] commission no later than April first.
4. The report required by subsection 1 of this section shall be made on forms as
prescribed by the [state tax] commission, and such statements and schedules as are contained
in the prescribed report shall be completed in conformity to such instructions and rules as may
be prescribed by the [state tax] commission.
5. If any railroad company refuses or fails to make and return the report required by
this chapter within the time prescribed and without an extension of time, the [state tax]
commission shall increase by four percent the total assessed valuation of the distributable
property of any such company unless the [state tax] commission, for good cause shown,
waives this penalty.
6. Any reports required by this chapter or chapter 153 delivered by United States mail
to the proper official or officer designated shall be deemed to be received as of the postmark
date stamped on the envelope or other cover in which such report is mailed. In the event any
report is sent by registered or certified mail, the date of registration or certification shall be
deemed the postmark date. No penalty shall be imposed under this chapter or chapter 153 on
any company whose reports are delivered by United States mail, if the postmark date stamped
on the envelope or other cover containing such reports falls within the prescribed period or on
or before the prescribed date, including any extension granted for making the report.

HB 2626 64
151.030. In addition to the report required by section 151.020, an authorized officer
of every railroad company shall, on or before the fifteenth day of April in each and every
year, furnish to the clerk of the county commission of each and every county in this state in
which such road or roads may be located, a duplicate of such portions of their report, as
required by the state [tax] assessment commission, of their distributable property in such
county as required in section 151.020, duly subscribed and sworn to by an authorized officer.
151.040. At the next term of the county commission after such report is received, the
clerk shall lay it before the county commission, and the county commission shall examine the
report and determine the correctness thereof as to the description of the distributable property
and if found correct, the county commission shall cause the clerk thereof to certify to the
correctness of the report, under the seal of the county commission, and forward the certificate
to the state [tax] assessment commission on or before the fifteenth day of May next
thereafter; if found in the opinion of the county commission to be incorrect, the county
commission shall proceed immediately to ascertain what distributable property has been
omitted, and shall return a description thereof to the state [tax] assessment commission
indicating the number of miles of road in each taxing jurisdiction cited in section 151.020 on
or before the fifteenth day of May next; and if the county commission shall fail to make or
cause to be made the certificate herein required, and in the time specified, the clerk shall make
the certificate and a certificate that the county commission has so failed.
151.050. Should any railroad company fail to make and return to the state [tax]
assessment commission and county clerks, on the proper forms, any of the reports required
by the foregoing provisions of this chapter, the [state tax] commission shall ascertain the
property of such company, from the best information they can obtain, and shall fix the value
thereof; which value shall serve as the base from which the four percent penalty provided in
section 151.020 is calculated.
151.060. 1. The [state tax] commission shall assess, adjust and equalize the aggregate
valuation of the distributable property of each one of the railroad companies in this state
specified in section 151.020. For the purpose of estimating the true value in money of the
distributable property of a railroad company, the [state tax] commission may take into
consideration the reports filed under section 151.020, the reports, statements or returns of the
company filed in the office of any board, office, or commission of this state, or any county
thereof, and such other evidence of any kind that is obtainable bearing thereon. However, no
report, statement or return shall be conclusive upon the [state tax] commission in estimating
the true value in money of the operating property of a railroad company.
2. The [state tax] commission shall have power to summon witnesses by process
issued to any officer authorized to serve subpoenas, and shall have the power of a circuit court
to compel the attendance of such witnesses, and to compel them to testify; they shall have the

HB 2626 65
power, upon their knowledge, or such information as they can obtain, to increase or reduce
the aggregate valuation of the distributable property of any railroad company included in the
reports and returns made by the railroad companies and the clerks of the county commissions,
and shall assess, adjust and equalize any other distributable property owned, used, leased or
otherwise controlled by such railroad companies, or any railroad company's distributable
property upon which no returns have been made, which may be otherwise known to them, as
they deem just and right. In the event the [state tax] commission determines that certain
distributable property has been omitted from the railroad's report under section 151.020, the
[state tax] commission shall describe the omitted distributable property in its records and shall
assess the omitted distributable property at double its true value in money unless the [state
tax] commission for good cause shown, waives this penalty.
3. In assessing, adjusting and equalizing any distributable railroad property for any
year or years the [state tax] commission may arrive at its finding, conclusion and judgment,
upon its knowledge, or such information as may be before it, and shall not be governed in its
findings, conclusions and judgment by the testimony which may be adduced, further than to
give to it such weight as the [state tax] commission may think it is entitled to, except that
when any railroad shall extend beyond the limits of this state and into another state in which a
tax is levied and paid on any distributable property of such railroad, then the [state tax]
commission shall assess, equalize and adjust only such proportion of the total value of all the
distributable property of such railroad company as may be reasonably allocated to this state.
To accomplish this end, the [state tax] commission may require information in its form
reports under subsection 4 of section 151.020 which is necessary to properly assess and
allocate such property.
4. The [state tax] commission shall assess the value of all bridges, approaches and
appurtenances thereto acquired by any railroad company or its wholly owned subsidiary in
this state by trade with a city not within a county at no greater value than the value of the
distributable property traded, as established for the year immediately preceding the calendar
year of the trade. Such assessment shall not increase, but may decrease, during ten years
following the acquisition of such bridges, approaches and appurtenances thereto by the
railroad or its wholly owned subsidiary from the city not within a county.
151.070. 1. The state [tax] assessment commission shall have the power to assess,
adjust and equalize the distributable property herein specified of any railroad company, in
whole or in part, for any of the five preceding years which has been or which may hereafter be
omitted from assessment, adjustment and equalization, and to reassess, adjust and equalize
any such distributable railroad property, in whole or in part, as the case may be, for any year
or years for which it may have been heretofore or in which it may hereafter be assessed,

HB 2626 66
adjusted and equalized, but which assessment, adjustment and equalization, for any cause has
been or which may hereafter be held by the courts to be irregular or void.
2. The double assessment on such omitted distributable property provided in
subsection 2 of section 151.060 shall also apply under this section.
151.080. The [state tax] commission shall apportion the aggregate value of all
distributable property herein specified, which is owned, used, leased or otherwise controlled
by each railroad company, to each county, municipal township, city or incorporated town,
special road districts, library districts, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes
pursuant to section 137.030, hospital districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts,
metropolitan zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350,
public water supply, fire protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school
districts, in which the road is located, according to the ratio which the number of miles of the
road completed in the county, municipal township, city or incorporated town, special road
district, library districts, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to
section 137.030, hospital districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts, metropolitan
zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350, public water
supply, fire protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school districts, in
which the road is located shall bear to the whole length of the road in this state; provided, that
in any case where a company whose line or road is liable to taxation shall have been or may
become consolidated into another corporation, entitled by its charter or otherwise to
exemption from county or other taxation, that portion of the road which is liable to taxation,
as aforesaid, shall be assessed separately, and the value thereof apportioned to the counties,
municipal townships, cities or incorporated towns, special road districts, library districts,
school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to section 137.030, hospital
districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts, metropolitan zoological park and
museum district established pursuant to section 184.350, public water supply, fire protection
and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school districts, in which it is located; and an
authorized officer of each such railroad company shall, in the annual reports rendered to the
[state tax] commission, as provided in section 151.020, include statement of the length of the
road within school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to section 137.030,
and library districts; provided, further, that in no event shall any school district levy school
taxes, taxes for the erection of public buildings, or for other purposes except library purposes
on the property herein specified, in any manner other than that provided for in section
151.150.
151.090. The state [tax] assessment commission shall keep a complete record of all
its proceedings and decisions, and shall cause the same to be signed officially by the
[chairman] chair and the secretary, and shall certify to the secretaries of the respective

HB 2626 67
railroad companies, and also to the county commissions of the proper counties, the action of
the state [tax] assessment commission. The certificate shall set forth the entire length of the
railroad, including sidetracks, in the state, and the valuation thereof per mile; the total value
of the distributable property of the railroad; the total length of the roadbed, including
sidetracks, in each county, municipal township, city or incorporated town, special road
district, library district, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to
section 137.030, hospital districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts, metropolitan
zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350, public water
supply, fire protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school districts; also
the total value of distributable property as assessed, adjusted, equalized, and apportioned to
such county, municipal township, city or incorporated town, special road district, library
district, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to section 137.030,
hospital districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts, metropolitan zoological park
and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350, public water supply, fire
protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other school districts therein, by the
state [tax] assessment commission. The certificates, respectively, shall be held and received
in all courts and places where the action of the [state tax] commission shall be called in
question, as prima facie evidence of the facts set forth in the certificates, and that each and
every act and thing required to be done by the [state tax] commission under the provisions of
this chapter, have been fully complied with, and the party using or offering the certificate in
evidence shall not be required to produce the record of the proceedings or decisions of the
[state tax] commission, or a copy thereof, nor any other matter or thing as evidence to sustain
the certificate.
151.100. All local property owned or controlled by any railroad company or
corporation in this state, shall be assessed by the proper assessors in the several counties,
cities, incorporated towns and villages wherein such property is located, under the general
revenue laws of the state and the municipal laws regulating the assessments of other local
property in such counties, cities, incorporated towns and villages, respectively, but the taxes
on the property so assessed shall be levied and collected according to the provisions of this
chapter. Review of such local railroad assessments shall be the first order of business of the
county board of equalization. In no event shall the board of equalization or any county officer
alter or amend the local assessed valuations of railroad property later than August fifteenth in
any year, except by order of the [state tax] commission.
151.110. 1. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 151.100, an
authorized officer of every such railroad company shall, in addition to the report required to
be furnished to the county clerk, as described in section 151.030, no later than April first in
each year, furnish to each county assessor in this state, wherever any local property owned or

HB 2626 68
controlled by such company may be located, a separate report, under oath for the benefit of
county and other local assessors, specifically describing all lands by county tax map parcel
number, situated in such county, and not included in their returns to the state [tax] assessment
commission and county clerks, under sections 151.020 and 151.030, owned or controlled by
such company, on the first day of January in each year, and the true value in money thereof.
2. Each county assessor in this state shall certify a copy of the report required by
subsection 1 of this section and a copy of assessments thereon to the county clerk, the
company and the state [tax] assessment commission no later than April twentieth in each
year.
3. An authorized officer of every such railroad company shall, in addition to the
reports required to be furnished to the county clerk as described in section 151.030 and
subsection 1 of this section, furnish to the state [tax] assessment commission a list by county
of the true value in money of all local property as derived by the county assessor in each
county no later than May first in each year.
151.140. The county commission, upon the receipt from the state [tax] assessment
commission of the returns of the county assessor and the certificate of cities, towns, villages,
special road districts, library districts, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes
pursuant to section 137.030, hospital districts, nursing home districts, ambulance districts,
metropolitan zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section 184.350,
public water supply districts, fire protection districts and sewer districts or subdivisions,
except other school districts, made under section 151.120 shall, at the regular term of the
county commission, if in session at the time, if not, at an adjourned term or a special term of
the county commission called for that purpose, ascertain and levy the taxes for state, county,
municipal township, city, incorporated town and village, school, special road, library,
hospital, nursing home, ambulance, zoological park and museum, public water supply, fire
protection and sewer purposes and for capital projects purposes and for other purposes on the
railroad and the property thereof, in such county, municipal township, city, incorporated town
or village, special road district, library district, school district which levies taxes for library
purposes pursuant to section 137.030, hospital district, nursing home district, ambulance
district, metropolitan zoological park and museum district established pursuant to section
184.350, public water supply district, fire protection district, sewer district or subdivision,
except other school districts, at the same rate as may be levied on other property, except that
the rate for school purposes and for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes, shall be
ascertained as described in section 151.150, and shall make an entry thereof on the records of
the county commission; and in case the county commission has failed or omitted, or may
hereafter fail or omit, from any cause whatever, to levy the taxes or any portion of the taxes
for any year or years, or in case the taxes or any portion of taxes for any year or years shall be

HB 2626 69
illegally or erroneously levied, then the county commission, at the time of making the regular
levy upon railroad property as herein provided, shall, in addition thereto, ascertain and levy
the taxes for state, county, municipal township, city, incorporated town or village, school,
special road, library, hospital, nursing home, ambulance, zoological park and museum, public
water supply, fire protection and sewer purposes, and for capital projects purposes and for
other purposes, on the railroad and the property thereof in such county, municipal township,
city, incorporated town or village, special road district, library district, school district which
levies taxes for library purposes pursuant to section 137.030, hospital district, nursing home
district, ambulance district, metropolitan zoological park and museum district established
pursuant to section 184.350, public water supply district, fire protection district and sewer
district or subdivision, which may have been or may hereafter be omitted or illegally or
erroneously levied upon the valuation of the railroad and the property thereof, as determined
by the state [tax] assessment commission for such year or years, at the same rates that were
levied upon other property for the year or years in which the taxes were omitted or illegally or
erroneously levied; provided that in no case shall the levy exceed the constitutional limits;
and which taxes, when so levied, shall become due and payable, delinquent and subject to
penalty as other railroad taxes now are, and shall be recoverable as provided in section
151.230.
151.150. 1. For the purpose of levying school taxes, including taxes for school
purposes, as defined in section 163.011 for capital projects purposes, as authorized under
section 165.011, "and for other purposes", as defined in section 151.160, in the several
counties of this state, on the distributable property of the railroad company, the several county
commissions shall ascertain from the returns in the office of the county clerk the average rate
of taxation levied for school purposes for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes,
each separately by the several local school boards or authorities of the several school districts
throughout the county.
2. The average rate for school purposes shall be ascertained by adding together the
local rates of the several school districts in the county and by dividing the sum thus obtained
by the whole number of districts levying a tax for school purposes. The county clerk shall
cause to be charged to the railroad companies taxes for school purposes at the average rate on
the proportionate value of the railroad property so certified to the county commission by the
state [tax] assessment commission, under the provisions of this chapter, and shall apportion
the taxes for school purposes, so levied and collected, among all the school districts in his or
her county, the same proportion that the September membership of a district, determined as
provided in (1) of subdivision (8) of section 163.011, bears to the sum of the September
membership of all districts in the county.

HB 2626 70
3. The average rate levied for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes, each
separately, shall be ascertained by adding together the local rates of the several districts in the
county levying a tax for capital projects purposes, or for other purposes and by dividing the
sum thus obtained in each case by the whole number of districts in the county. The county
clerk shall cause to be charged to the railroad companies taxes for capital projects purposes,
or for other purposes, at the average rate on the proportionate value of the railroad
distributable property so certified to the county commission by the state [tax] assessment
commission, under the provisions of this chapter, and the county commission shall apportion
the taxes for capital projects purposes, or for other purposes so levied and collected, among
the several school districts levying the taxes, in proportion to the amount of such taxes so
levied in each of the districts.
4. All local property owned or controlled by a railroad company lying in any school
district shall be taxed at the same rate as other property in the district, and the school taxes,
including taxes for capital projects purposes, and for other purposes thereon, shall go to the
district in which such property is situated.
151.170. Within ten days after the county commission has levied the taxes on railroad
property, as prescribed in sections 151.140 and 151.150, the county clerk of the county shall
extend the same on a separate tax book, to be known as "the railroad tax book", in which he
or she shall place, first, the total valuation of the distributable property of each railroad
company, as assessed, equalized and apportioned to the county by the state [tax] assessment
commission, with the amount of state, county, municipal township, city, incorporated town
and village, school, special road, library, hospital, nursing home, ambulance, zoological park
and museum, public water supply, fire protection and sewer taxes and taxes for the erection of
public buildings and for other purposes, levied thereon by the county commission, stated
separately; second, a description of the local property, as returned by local assessors, and the
amount of state, county, municipal, city, town or village school taxes, and taxes for the
erection of public buildings, and for other purposes, levied thereon, stating each separately,
and crediting school taxes and taxes for the erection of public buildings, and for other
purposes, to the proper district or political subdivision.
151.320. On or before the fifteenth day of April in each year, the president or other
authorized officer of every street railroad company in every city of this state whose line is
now or shall hereafter become so far completed and in operation as to run electric cars, trolley
cars, motorbuses, or cars propelled by any other device for the transportation of passengers,
shall furnish to the [state tax] commission a statement duly subscribed and sworn to by the
president or other authorized officer, before some officer authorized to administer oaths,
setting out in detail the distributable property of the street railroad, the true value in money
thereof and such information concerning itself and all of its property, wherever situated, as the

HB 2626 71
[state tax] commission may reasonably require for the purpose of estimating the true value in
money of such distributable property of the street railroad company in this state and for
apportioning the valuation for assessment of such property among the various counties.
151.330. The distributable property returned to the [state tax] commission, as by
section 151.320 required, shall be subject to taxation for state, county, municipal and other
purposes to the same extent as the real and tangible personal property of private persons, and
the same shall be assessed, apportioned, certified and the taxes thereon levied and collected at
the time and in the manner which is now or may hereafter be provided by law for the
assessment and taxation of other railroad property.
151.340. If any commissioner or clerk of any county commission, collector or any
member of the state [tax] assessment commission, shall fail to discharge the duties imposed
upon him or her under this chapter, in the manner and time required therein, he or she shall
be liable to a fine of not less than one hundred nor more than five hundred dollars, to be
recovered by civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.
153.030. 1. All bridges over streams dividing this state from any other state owned,
used, leased or otherwise controlled by any person, corporation, railroad company or joint
stock company, and all bridges across or over navigable streams within this state, where the
charge is made for crossing the same, which are now constructed, which are in the course of
construction, or which shall hereafter be constructed, and all property, real and tangible
personal, owned, used, leased or otherwise controlled by telegraph, telephone, electric power
and light companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline companies and express companies
shall be subject to taxation for state, county, municipal and other local purposes to the same
extent as the property of private persons.
2. And taxes levied thereon shall be levied and collected in the manner as is now or
may hereafter be provided by law for the taxation of railroad property in this state, and county
commissions, county boards of equalization and the state [tax] assessment commission are
hereby required to perform the same duties and are given the same powers, including punitive
powers, in assessing, equalizing and adjusting the taxes on the property set forth in this
section as the county commissions and boards of equalization and state [tax] assessment
commission have or may hereafter be empowered with, in assessing, equalizing, and
adjusting the taxes on railroad property; and an authorized officer of any such bridge,
telegraph, telephone, electric power and light companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline
companies, or express company or the owner of any such toll bridge, is hereby required to
render reports of the property of such bridge, telegraph, telephone, electric power and light
companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline companies, or express companies in like
manner as the authorized officer of the railroad company is now or may hereafter be required
to render for the taxation of railroad property.

HB 2626 72
3. On or before the fifteenth day of April in the year 1946 and each year thereafter an
authorized officer of each such company shall furnish the state [tax] assessment commission
and county clerks a report, duly subscribed and sworn to by such authorized officer, which is
like in nature and purpose to the reports required of railroads under chapter 151 showing the
full amount of all real and tangible personal property owned, used, leased or otherwise
controlled by each such company on January first of the year in which the report is due.
4. If any telephone company assessed pursuant to chapter 153 has a microwave relay
station or stations in a county in which it has no wire mileage but has wire mileage in another
county, then, for purposes of apportioning the assessed value of the distributable property of
such companies, the straight line distance between such microwave relay stations shall
constitute miles of wire. In the event that any public utility company assessed pursuant to this
chapter has no distributable property which physically traverses the counties in which it
operates, then the assessed value of the distributable property of such company shall be
apportioned to the physical location of the distributable property.
5. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1,
2019, a telephone company shall make a one-time election within the tax year to be assessed:
(a) Using the methodology for property tax purposes as provided under this section;
or
(b) Using the methodology for property tax purposes as provided under this section
for property consisting of land and buildings and be assessed for all other property
exclusively using the methodology utilized under section 137.122.

If a telephone company begins operations, including a merger of multiple telephone
companies, after August 28, 2018, it shall make its one-time election to be assessed using the
methodology for property tax purposes as described under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of
this subsection within the year in which the telephone company begins its operations. A
telephone company that fails to make a timely election shall be deemed to have elected to be
assessed using the methodology for property tax purposes as provided under subsections 1 to
4 of this section.
(2) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to change the original
assessment jurisdiction of the state [tax] assessment commission.
(3) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed as applying to any
other utility.
(4) (a) The provisions of this subdivision shall ensure that school districts may avoid
any fiscal impact as a result of a telephone company being assessed under the provisions of
paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection. If a school district's current operating levy
is below the greater of its most recent voter-approved tax rate or the most recent voter-

HB 2626 73
approved tax rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section 137.073, it shall
comply with section 137.073.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2019, any school district currently operating at a tax rate
equal to the greater of the most recent voter-approved tax rate or the most recent voter-
approved tax rate as adjusted under subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section 137.073 that
receives less tax revenue from a specific telephone company under this subsection, on or
before January thirty-first of the year following the tax year in which the school district
received less revenue from a specific telephone company, may by resolution of the school
board impose a fee, as determined under this subsection, in order to obtain such revenue. The
resolution shall include all facts that support the imposition of the fee. If the school district
receives voter approval to raise its tax rate, the district shall no longer impose the fee
authorized in this paragraph.
(c) Any fee imposed under paragraph (b) of this subdivision shall be determined by
taking the difference between the tax revenue the telephone company paid in the tax year in
question and the tax revenue the telephone company would have paid in such year had it not
made an election under subdivision (1) of this subsection, which shall be calculated by taking
the telephone company valuations in the tax year in question, as determined by the state [tax]
assessment commission under paragraph (d) of this subdivision, and applying such
valuations to the apportionment process in subsection 2 of section 151.150. The school
district shall issue a billing, as provided in this subdivision, to any such telephone company.
A telephone company shall have forty-five days after receipt of a billing to remit its payment
of its portion of the fees to the school district. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
the issuance or receipt of such fee shall not be used:
a. In determining the amount of state aid that a school district receives under section
163.031;
b. In determining the amount that may be collected under a property tax levy by such
district; or
c. For any other purpose.

For the purposes of accounting, a telephone company that issues a payment to a school
district under this subsection shall treat such payment as a tax.
(d) When establishing the valuation of a telephone company assessed under
paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the state [tax] assessment commission
shall also determine the difference between the assessed value of a telephone company if:
a. Assessed under paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection; and
b. Assessed exclusively under subsections 1 to 4 of this section.


HB 2626 74
The state [tax] assessment commission shall then apportion such amount to each county and
provide such information to any school district making a request for such information.
100 (e) This subsection shall expire when no school district is eligible for a fee.
101 6. (1) If any public utility company assessed pursuant to this chapter has ownership
102 of any real or personal property associated with a project which uses wind energy directly to
103 generate electricity, such wind energy project property shall be valued and taxed by any local
104 authorities having jurisdiction under the provisions of chapter 137 and other relevant
105 provisions of the law.
106 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2020,
107 for any public utility company assessed pursuant to this chapter which has a wind energy
108 project, such wind energy project shall be assessed using the methodology for real and
109 personal property as provided in this subsection:
110 (a) Any wind energy property of such company shall be assessed upon the county
111 assessor's local tax rolls; and
112 (b) All other real property, excluding land, or personal property related to the wind
113 energy project shall be assessed using the methodology provided under section 137.123.
114 7. (1) If any public utility company assessed pursuant to this chapter has ownership
115 of any real or personal property associated with a generation project which was originally
116 constructed utilizing financing authorized pursuant to chapter 100 for construction, upon the
117 transfer of ownership of such property to the public utility company such property shall be
118 valued and taxed by any local authorities having jurisdiction under the provisions of chapter
119 137 and other relevant provisions of law.
120 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2022,
121 for any public utility company assessed pursuant to this chapter which has ownership of any
122 real or personal property associated with a generation project which was originally
123 constructed utilizing financing authorized pursuant to chapter 100 for construction, upon the
124 transfer of ownership of such property to the public utility company such property shall be
125 assessed as follows:
126 (a) Any property associated with a generation project which was originally
127 constructed utilizing financing authorized pursuant to chapter 100 for construction shall be
128 assessed upon the county assessor's local tax rolls. The assessor shall rely on the public utility
129 company for cost information of the generation portion of the property as found in the public
130 utility company's Federal Energy Regulatory Commission Financial Report Form Number
131 One at the time of transfer of ownership, and depreciate the costs provided in a manner
132 similar to other commercial and industrial property;

HB 2626 75
133 (b) Any property consisting of land and buildings related to the generation property
134 associated with a generation project which was originally constructed utilizing financing
135 pursuant to chapter 100 for construction shall be assessed under chapter 137; and
136 (c) All other business or personal property related to a generation project which was
137 originally constructed utilizing financing pursuant to chapter 100 for construction shall be
138 assessed using the methodology provided under section 137.122.
153.040. In all cases where a part of any such bridge, as set forth in section 153.030,
is in this state and part in another state, such part of such bridge as is in this state only shall be
subject to assessment and taxation in this state, and the parties rendering reports, and the
county commissions, boards of equalization and the state [tax] assessment commission, shall
only be required to render reports, assess, equalize and adjust taxes on such part of such
bridge as may be in this state.
153.050. Should an authorized officer of any such bridge, telegraph, telephone,
electric power and light companies, electric transmission lines, pipeline companies or express
company fail to make and return to the state [tax] assessment commission, the director of
revenue and county clerks any of the reports required by this chapter, the county
commissions, boards of equalization and the state [tax] assessmentcommission shall proceed
in the same manner to assess, equalize and adjust the taxes on such property as authorized and
empowered by the law providing for the assessment, equalization and adjustment of taxes on
railroad property in this state.
155.020. On or before the first day of May of each and every year, the president or
any authorized officer of every commercial airline company operating in air commerce in this
state shall furnish to the [state tax] commission a statement, in the form as is prescribed by the
[state tax] commission, duly subscribed and sworn to by the president or other authorized
officer, before some officer authorized to administer oaths, setting forth:
(1) The total length in this state of its certificated routes;
(2) The total length of all its certificated routes;
(3) The total miles flown in this state by its commercial aircraft during the next
preceding calendar year;
(4) The total miles flown by such commercial aircraft during the next preceding
calendar year;
(5) The total number of all commercial aircraft owned, used or leased by such airline
company on the first day of January in each year, and the actual cash value of such
commercial aircraft;
(6) The other information the [state tax] commission requires to enable it to carry out
the provisions of this chapter.

HB 2626 76
155.030. In case the report from any airline company required by section 155.020 is
not received by May first of the year in which it is due, the [state tax] commission, at its
discretion, may increase by four percent the total assessed value of the flight equipment of the
airline company as is determined by the commission under the provisions of section 155.040.
155.040. 1. The [state tax] commission shall assess, adjust and equalize the valuation
of all commercial aircraft operated in this state in air commerce by every airline company.
The valuation apportioned to this state shall be the portion of the total valuation of the
commercial aircraft as determined by the [state tax] commission on the basis of the
arithmetical average of the following two ratios:
(1) The ratio which the certificated route miles of the airline company within the state
bears to the total certificated route miles of the airline company;
(2) The ratio which the miles flown by commercial aircraft of the airline company
within this state bears to the total miles flown by the commercial aircraft of the airline
company during the immediately preceding calendar year.
2. In the event one ratio is inapplicable, then the apportionment shall be made on the
basis of the remaining ratio alone.
3. The [state tax] commission shall assess, adjust and equalize the valuation of all
commercial aircraft, other than commercial aircraft operated in this state in air commerce by
any airline company, which are operated in this state. By May first of each year, the county
assessor shall provide the [state tax] commission with any information compiled from
personal property lists filed with the assessor necessary for the [state tax] commission to
assess aircraft pursuant to this subsection. It shall be the duty of the owner or holder of
commercial aircraft to inform the assessor of the claim of "commercial aircraft" upon the
return of the personal property list to the assessor. Upon request, the owner or holder of the
commercial aircraft shall provide to the [state tax] commission any additional information
which the [state tax] commission deems necessary to assess said property. The valuation
allocated to this state shall be the portion of the total valuation of the aircraft as determined by
the [state tax] commission based upon the ratio which the miles flown by the commercial
aircraft within this state bears to the total miles flown by the aircraft during the immediately
preceding calendar year.
4. The [state tax] commission shall certify all values of commercial aircraft
determined by the [state tax] commission to the taxpayer and the clerks of the respective
counties and the city of St. Louis by June fifteenth of the tax year.
5. Any owner or holder may appeal said assessment of commercial aircraft directly to
the [state tax] commission by August fifteenth of the tax year without first appealing to the
local board of equalization. Counsel for the [state tax] commission shall represent the

HB 2626 77
commission's original assessment section in any such proceeding, with a duly appointed
hearing officer or officers hearing and deciding the case.
155.050. The [state tax] commission shall apportion the aggregate value of the
commercial aircraft of an airline company, as determined under the provisions of section
155.040, to each county, municipal township, city, incorporated town, special road districts,
library districts, school districts which levy taxes for library purposes pursuant to section
137.030, public water supply, fire protection and sewer districts or subdivisions, except other
school districts, in which the airline company has arrivals and departures of its commercial
aircraft. This apportionment shall be made on the ratio which the number of arrivals and
departures of its commercial aircraft within the political subdivision of this state bears to the
total number of arrivals and departures of its commercial aircraft within this state during the
immediately preceding calendar year, except that when any municipality in this state owns
and operates an airport outside its corporate limits, the valuation determined hereunder shall
also be apportioned to such municipality.
160.254. 1. There is hereby established a joint committee of the general assembly,
which shall be known as the "Joint Committee on Education", which shall be composed of
seven members of the senate and seven members of the house of representatives. The senate
members of the committee shall be appointed by the president pro tem of the senate and the
house members by the speaker of the house.
2. The committee shall meet at least twice a year. In the event of three consecutive
absences on the part of any member, such member may be removed from the committee.
3. The committee shall select either a [chairman] chairor [cochairmen] co-chair, one
of whom shall be a member of the senate and one a member of the house. A majority of the
members shall constitute a quorum. Meetings of the committee may be called at such time
and place as the [chairman] chair or [chairmen] chairs designate.
4. The committee shall:
(1) Review and monitor the progress of education in the state's public schools and
institutions of higher education;
(2) Receive reports from the commissioner of education concerning the public
schools and from the commissioner of higher education concerning institutions of higher
education;
(3) Conduct a study and analysis of the public school system;
(4) Make recommendations to the general assembly for legislative action;
(5) Conduct an in-depth study concerning all issues relating to the equity and
adequacy of the distribution of state school aid, teachers' salaries, funding for school
buildings, and overall funding levels for schools and any other education funding-related
issues the committee deems relevant;

HB 2626 78
(6) Monitor the establishment of performance measures as required by section
173.1006 and report on their establishment to the governor and the general assembly;
(7) Conduct studies and analysis regarding:
(a) The higher education system, including financing public higher education and the
provision of financial aid for higher education; and
(b) The feasibility of including students enrolled in proprietary schools, as that term is
defined in section 173.600, in all state-based financial aid programs;
(8) Annually review the collection of information under section 173.093 to facilitate a
more accurate comparison of the actual costs at public and private higher education
institutions;
(9) Within three years of August 28, 2007, review a new model for the funding of
public higher education institutions upon submission of such model by the coordinating board
for higher education;
(10) Within three years of August 28, 2007, review the impact of the higher education
student funding act established in sections 173.1000 to 173.1006;
(11) Beginning August 28, 2008, upon review, approve or deny any expenditures
made by the commissioner of education pursuant to section 160.530, as provided in
subsection 5 of section 160.530.
5. The committee may make reasonable requests for staff assistance from the research
and appropriations staffs of the house and senate and the committee on legislative research, as
well as the department of elementary and secondary education, the department of higher
education and workforce development, the coordinating board for higher education, the state
[tax] assessment commission, the department of economic development, all school districts
and other political subdivisions of this state, teachers and teacher groups, business and other
commercial interests and any other interested persons.
6. Members of the committee shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed
for reasonable and necessary expenses associated with the performance of their official
duties.
162.925. All real and tangible personal property owned by railroads, street railways,
bridge companies, telegraph companies, electric light and power companies, electric
transmission line companies, pipeline companies, express companies, airline companies and
other companies and public utilities whose property is assessed by the state [tax] assessment
commission shall be taxed at the same rate of taxation levied on other property in the special
school district and said property shall be taxed in the same manner and to the same extent as
property which is subject to assessment and taxation for general county purposes, and all of
the provisions of chapters 151, 153, 154 and 155 shall apply to taxation by special school
districts to the same extent as if special school districts were specifically included in the

HB 2626 79
provisions contained in chapters 151, 153, 154 and 155, except that the taxes levied by special
school districts shall not be included for the purpose of determining the average school levy
for the other school districts in the county in which they are situated. The taxes levied against
the property by special school districts shall be collected in the same manner as general
county taxes.
164.011. 1. The school board of each district annually shall prepare an estimate of the
amount of money to be raised by taxation for the ensuing school year, the rate required to
produce the amount, and the rate necessary to sustain the school or schools of the district for
the ensuing school year, to meet principal and interest payments on the bonded debt of the
district and to provide the funds to meet other legitimate district purposes. In preparing the
estimate, the board shall have sole authority in determining what part of the total authorized
rate shall be used to provide revenue for each of the funds as authorized by section 165.011.
Prior to setting tax rates for the teachers' and incidental funds, the school board of each school
district annually shall set the tax rate for the capital projects fund as necessary to meet the
expenditures of the capital projects fund after all transfers allowed pursuant to subsection 4 of
section 165.011. Furthermore the tax rate set in the capital projects fund shall not require the
reduction of the equalized combined tax rates for the teachers' and incidental funds to be less
than the greater of the minimum operating levy for the current year for school purposes
established under subsection 2 of section 163.021.
2. The school board of each district shall forward the estimate to the county clerk on
or before September first. In school districts divided by county lines, the estimate shall be
forwarded to the proper officer of each county in which any part of the district lies.
3. When revising its tax rate each year, the aggregate increase in the valuation of
property assessed by the state [tax] assessment commission for the current year over that of
the previous year shall be considered new construction and improvement.
4. The department of elementary and secondary education and any other government
agency involved in the tax rate process shall update the necessary forms, reports, and
documents in order to implement the provisions of this section.
164.013. 1. When the revenue from the rate of one cent on the dollar of the state sales
is collected for distribution under the provisions of section 163.087, the school board of each
seven-director, including special districts, urban and metropolitan school districts, after
determining its budget for the school year and the rate of levy needed to produce the required
revenue as provided in section 164.011, and after making any other adjustments to the levy
that may be required by any other law, shall, unless at least a simple majority of district voters
voting thereon have approved a proposal to forego all or part of a reduction in the total
operating levy for school purposes as provided for in this section, reduce the total operating
levy for school purposes in an amount sufficient to decrease the revenue it would have

HB 2626 80
received therefrom by an amount equal to fifty percent of the previous fiscal year's sales tax
receipts excluding the sales tax revenue estimated to be received by the district attributable to
pupils residing on federal lands and excluding the amount of sales tax revenue estimated to be
necessary to offset the loss of property tax revenue to the school district under the provisions
of section 50.338, except that the provision of this section shall not require a school board to
reduce its total operating levy for school purposes below an amount which is equal to the
highest amount specified in subsection 2 of section 163.021 as an eligibility requirement for
state aid or increased state aid pursuant to section 163.031. Loss of revenue, due to a decrease
in the assessed valuation of real property located within the school district as a result of
general reassessment, and from state-assessed railroad and utility distributable property based
upon the previous fiscal year's receipts shall be considered in lowering the rate of levy to
comply with this section in the year of general reassessment and in each subsequent year. For
any district for which the total assessed valuation of the district is reduced as a result of a
natural disaster for which the county or counties containing the district were designated a
disaster area, the reduction of the total operating levy for school purposes pursuant to this
section may, at the district's discretion, be calculated either on the district's current assessed
valuation or upon the district's assessed valuation for the year preceding the natural disaster,
until the fifth year following the designation as a disaster area or until the district's assessed
valuation equals or exceeds the district's assessed valuation for the year preceding the
disaster, whichever first occurs. In the event that in the immediately preceding year the
school district actually received more or less sales tax revenue than estimated, the school
board shall adjust its operating levy for the current year to reflect such increase or decrease.
Adjustments in the tax rate of a school district pursuant to the provisions of this section shall
in no way affect the eligibility of claimants for benefits, or the amount of claimants' benefits,
under the provisions of sections 135.010 to 135.035. Such claimants shall, if they are
otherwise qualified, receive the benefits to which they were or would have been entitled in the
year prior to March 3, 1983. There shall be transferred from the school district trust fund to
the general revenue fund an amount equal to the difference in the amount paid or credited or
which would have been paid or credited to individuals qualifying under sections 135.010 to
135.035 in the year prior to March 3, 1983, and the amount paid or credited under the
provisions of such sections each year thereafter. The director of revenue shall certify the
amount payable from the school district trust fund to the general revenue fund to the state
treasurer, the commissioner of administration and the state board of education on or before
the first day of each month. Any school district required to reduce its total operating levy
under the provisions of this section shall not become ineligible for state aid under the
provisions of section 163.021 because of such required reduction. In the event a district fails
to reduce its operating levy in compliance with this section, an amount equivalent to the

HB 2626 81
amount by which the district fails to reduce its levy shall be deducted from the district's
apportionment of state aid under the provisions of section 163.031 for the following year.
2. In a year of general reassessment, as defined by section 137.073, or assessment
maintenance as defined by section 137.115, in which a school district in reliance upon the
information then available to it relating to the total assessed valuation of such school district
revises its property tax levy pursuant to section 137.073 or 137.115, and it is subsequently
determined by decisions of the state [tax] assessment commission or a court pursuant to
sections 138.430 to 138.433 or due to clerical errors or corrections in the calculation or
recordation of assessed valuations that the assessed valuation of such school district has been
changed, and but for such change the school district would have adopted a different levy on
the date of its original action, then the school district may adjust its levy to an amount to
reflect such change in assessed valuation, including, if necessary, a change in the levy
reduction required by this section to the amount it would have levied had the correct assessed
valuation been known to it on the date of its original action, provided:
(1) The school district first levies the maximum levy allowed without a vote of the
people by Article X, Section 11(b) of the Constitution of Missouri; and
(2) The school district first adopts the tax rate ceiling otherwise authorized by other
laws of this state; and
(3) The levy adjustment or reduction may include a one-time correction to recoup lost
revenues the school district was entitled to receive during the prior year.
178.880. All real and tangible personal property owned by railroads, street railways,
boats, vessels, bridge companies, telegraph companies, electric light and power companies,
electric transmission line companies, pipeline companies, express companies, airline
companies and other companies and public utilities whose property is assessed by the state
[tax] assessment commission shall be taxed at the same rate of taxation which is levied on
other property in the community college district in the same manner and to the same extent
that the property is subject to assessment and taxation for general county purposes, and all of
the provisions of chapters 151, 153, 154 and 155 shall apply to taxation by community
college districts to the same extent as if the community college districts were specifically
included in the provisions contained in chapters 151, 153, 154 and 155, except that the taxes
levied by community college districts shall not be included for the purpose of determining the
average school levy for the other school districts in the county in which they are situated. The
taxes levied against the property by community college districts shall be collected in the same
manner as taxes are collected on the property from general county taxes.
233.500. 1. Within the boundaries of any special road district established under the
provisions of section 233.015, 233.170 or 233.320, or in an area within a county which is not
included in any special road district, the county commission may create a special road

HB 2626 82
subdistrict in the manner prescribed in sections 233.500 to 233.520. Any such subdistrict
established shall be a body corporate and possess the usual powers of a public corporation for
public purposes, and shall be known as "______ Special Road Subdistrict of ______ County"
and in that name shall be capable of suing and being sued, of holding such real estate and
personal property as may at any time be either donated to or purchased by it in accordance
with the provisions of sections 233.500 to 233.520, and of contracting and being contracted
with as provided in sections 233.500 to 233.520.
2. Special road subdistricts so organized shall consist of a public road of one mile or
more in length and the adjacent lands one-fourth of a mile or more on either side of such
public road, including adjacent roads one-fourth of a mile or more from the public road, and
any such special road subdistrict shall have an assessed valuation of at least one million
dollars, according to the last available report of the state [tax] assessment commission, or its
successor entity.
321.554. 1. When the revenue from the ambulance or fire protection district sales tax
is collected for distribution pursuant to section 321.552, the board of the ambulance or fire
protection district, after determining its budget for the year pursuant to section 67.010 and the
rate of levy needed to produce the required revenue and after making any other adjustments to
the levy that may be required by any other law, shall reduce the total operating levy of the
district in an amount sufficient to decrease the revenue it would have received therefrom by
an amount equal to fifty percent of the previous fiscal year's sales tax receipts. Loss of
revenue due to a decrease in the assessed valuation of real property located within the
ambulance or fire protection district as a result of general reassessment and from state-
assessed railroad and utility distributable property based upon the previous fiscal year's
receipts shall be considered in lowering the rate of levy to comply with this section in the year
of general reassessment and in each subsequent year. In the event that in the immediately
preceding year the ambulance or fire protection district actually received more or less sales
tax revenue than estimated, the ambulance or fire protection district board may adjust its
operating levy for the current year to reflect such increase or decrease. The director of
revenue shall certify the amount payable from the ambulance or fire protection district sales
tax trust fund to the general revenue fund to the state treasurer.
2. Except that, in the first year in which any sales tax is collected pursuant to section
321.552, any taxing authority subject to this section shall not reduce the tax rate as defined in
section 137.073.
3. In a year of general reassessment, as defined by section 137.073, or assessment
maintenance as defined by section 137.115 in which an ambulance or fire protection district
in reliance upon the information then available to it relating to the total assessed valuation of
such ambulance or fire protection district revises its property tax levy pursuant to section

HB 2626 83
137.073 or 137.115, and it is subsequently determined by decisions of the state [tax]
assessment commission or a court pursuant to sections 138.430 to 138.433 or due to clerical
errors or corrections in the calculation or recordation of assessed valuations that the assessed
valuation of such ambulance or fire protection district has been changed, and but for such
change the ambulance or fire protection district would have adopted a different levy on the
date of its original action, then the ambulance or fire protection district may adjust its levy to
an amount to reflect such change in assessed valuation, including, if necessary, a change in
the levy reduction required by this section to the amount it would have levied had the correct
assessed valuation been known to it on the date of its original action, provided:
(1) The ambulance or fire protection district first levies the maximum levy allowed
without a vote of the people by Article X, Section 11(b) of the Constitution of Missouri; and
(2) The ambulance or fire protection district first adopts the tax rate ceiling otherwise
authorized by other laws of this state; and
(3) The levy adjustment or reduction may include a one-time correction to recoup lost
revenues the ambulance or fire protection district was entitled to receive during the prior year.
536.085. As used in section 536.087, the following terms mean:
(1) "Agency proceeding", an adversary proceeding in a contested case pursuant to this
chapter in which the state is represented by counsel, but does not include proceedings for
determining the eligibility or entitlement of an individual to a monetary benefit or its
equivalent, child custody proceedings, eminent domain proceedings, driver's license
proceedings, vehicle registration proceedings, proceedings to establish or fix a rate, or
proceedings before the state [tax] assessment commission;
(2) "Party":
(a) An individual whose net worth did not exceed two million dollars at the time the
civil action or agency proceeding was initiated; or
(b) Any owner of an unincorporated business or any partnership, corporation,
association, unit of local government or organization, the net worth of which did not exceed
seven million dollars at the time the civil action or agency proceeding was initiated, and
which had not more than five hundred employees at the time the civil action or agency
proceeding was initiated;
(3) "Prevails", obtains a favorable order, decision, judgment, or dismissal in a civil
action or agency proceeding;
(4) "Reasonable fees and expenses" includes the reasonable expenses of expert
witnesses, the reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test, or project which
is found by the court or agency to be necessary for the preparation of the party's case, and
reasonable attorney or agent fees. The amount of fees awarded as reasonable fees and
expenses shall be based upon prevailing market rates for the kind and quality of the services

HB 2626 84
furnished, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest
rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the state in the type of civil action or
agency proceeding, and attorney's fees shall not be awarded in excess of seventy-five dollars
per hour unless the court determines that a special factor, such as the limited availability of
qualified attorneys for the proceedings involved, justifies a higher fee;
(5) "State", the state of Missouri, its officers and its agencies, but shall not include
political subdivisions of the state.
✔